Missouri, session 2026, SB1294.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 21.360, 29.080, 30.400, 34.160,
41.720, 92.920, 105.276, 115.405, 115.631, 115.633, 141.810,
143.911, 144.157, 144.480, 147.120, 149.071, 149.076, 192.2015,
194.275, 194.280, 217.305, 217.362, 217.655, 217.690, 217.760,
252.220, 257.430, 260.425, 268.151, 311.460, 361.290, 362.100,
362.171, 375.350, 375.390, 375.410, 375.470, 386.560, 387.290,
392.330, 393.220, 409.109, 409.5-501, 409.5-505, 409.5-508,
411.611, 411.621, 411.641, 411.651, 556.061, 557.011, 557.021,
558.011, 558.019, 558.026, 558.031, 558.046, 559.115, 566.030,
566.032, 566.060, 566.062, 566.067, 566.103, 566.125, 566.151,
566.203, 566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 567.050, 568.060,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1294 2
570.030, 571.015, 571.030, 573.025, 575.151, 575.270, 577.010,
578.425, 589.425, 622.470, 643.250, and 644.076, RSMo, are
repealed and eighty-five new sections enacted in lieu thereof,
to be known as sections 21.360, 29.080, 30.400, 34.160, 41.720,
92.920, 105.276, 115.405, 115.631, 115.633, 141.810, 143.911,
144.157, 144.480, 147.120, 149.071, 149.076, 192.2015, 194.275,
194.280, 217.305, 217.362, 217.655, 217.690, 217.760, 252.220,
257.430, 260.425, 268.151, 311.460, 361.290, 362.100, 362.171,
375.350, 375.390, 375.410, 375.470, 386.560, 387.290, 392.330,
393.220, 409.109, 409.5-501, 409.5-505, 409.5-508, 411.611,
411.621, 411.641, 411.651, 556.061, 557.011, 557.021, 558.011,
558.019, 558.026, 558.031, 558.046, 559.115, 566.030, 566.032,
566.060, 566.062, 566.067, 566.103, 566.125, 566.151, 566.203,
566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 567.050, 568.060, 570.030,
571.015, 571.030, 573.025, 575.151, 575.270, 577.010, 578.425,
589.425, 622.470, 643.250, and 644.076, to read as follows:
21.360. Any member of the house of representatives who
through the medium of any voting station, records the vote
of another member, or who authorizes another member, or
other person, to record his vote, and any person, other than
a member of the house, who through the medium of a voting
station, records the vote of any member is guilty of a class
C felony[,] and, upon conviction, shall be punished by
imprisonment [in the penitentiary] for a term [of] not less
than three nor more than ten years. Any person found guilty
of a violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
29.080. For any violation of his or her oath of office
or of any duty imposed upon him or her by this chapter, any
examiner shall be guilty of a class E felony[,] and, upon
conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment [in the
penitentiary] for a term not exceeding [five] four years, or

SB 1294 3
by a fine not less than one hundred dollars [or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one nor
more than twelve months,] or by both such fine and
imprisonment. Any person found guilty of a violation of
this section may be subject to an extended prison term
pursuant to section 558.016.
30.400. The making of profit by the state treasurer
out of any moneys in the state treasury belonging to the
state, the custody of which the state treasurer shall be
charged with, by loaning, depositing, or otherwise using or
disposing of the same in any manner whatever, or the removal
by the state treasurer, or by his or her consent, of such
moneys, or any part thereof, or any bonds deposited by any
bank in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, or
of United States obligations in which [he] the state
treasurer has invested state moneys, out of the vaults of
the treasury department in the state capitol, except for the
payment of warrants legally drawn, or for the purpose of
depositing the same in the bank or banks selected as
depositaries under the provisions of this chapter, or for
investing in United States obligations as provided by law,
or for returning or disposing of said bonds or obligations
according to law, shall be deemed a class E felony[,] and,
on conviction thereof, subject him or her to punishment by
imprisonment [in the penitentiary] for a term [of] not
[less] more than [two] four years, and [he] the state
treasurer shall also be liable under and upon his or her
official bond for all profits realized from any such
unlawful using of said funds; and it shall be the duty of
the attorney general to enter and prosecute to final
determination all suits for a violation of any of the
provisions of this chapter. Any person found guilty of a

SB 1294 4
violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
34.160. The commissioner of administration shall not
be interested in any manner in any person, firm, or
corporation making bids for furnishing supplies or printing
to the state or any subdivision or department thereof. [He]
The commissioner of administration shall not receive nor
accept, directly or indirectly, from any person, firm, or
corporation who may bid for furnishing, or receive a
contract to furnish, any supplies or printing of any kind to
the state, any rebate, gift, or other valuable thing.
Acceptance of any such rebate, gift, or other valuable thing
by the commissioner of administration shall be deemed a
class E felony and, on conviction thereof, he shall be
punished by imprisonment [in the state penitentiary] for a
term not [less than two nor] more than [five] four years, or
by fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
two thousand dollars, or by both such fine and
imprisonment. Any person found guilty of a violation of
this section may be subject to an extended prison term
pursuant to section 558.016.
41.720. After the proclamation by the governor as
authorized by section 41.480, any person who resists or aids
in resisting the execution of process in any area declared
to be in a state of actual or threatened insurrection, or
who aids or attempts the rescue or escape of another from
lawful custody or confinement or who resists or aids in
resisting any force ordered out by the governor to execute
the laws, to suppress actual and prevent threatened
insurrection or to repel invasion shall be guilty of a class
E felony punishable by imprisonment [in the state
penitentiary] for a term not [less] more than [two] four

SB 1294 5
years. Any person found guilty of a violation of this
section may be subject to an extended prison term pursuant
to section 558.016.
92.920. 1. Neither said members nor any salaried
employee of the land reutilization authority provided for
herein shall receive any compensation, emolument, or other
profit directly or indirectly from the rental, management,
purchase, sale or other disposition of any lands held by
such land reutilization authority other than the salaries,
expenses, and emoluments provided for herein in sections
92.700 to 92.920.
2. Any person convicted of violating this section
shall be deemed guilty of a class E felony and, upon
conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to serve not [less
than two nor] more than [five] four years [in the state
penitentiary] of imprisonment. Any person found guilty of a
violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
105.276. Any person who with intent to defraud uses on
a public security or an instrument of payment a facsimile
signature, or any reproduction of it, of any authorized
officer; or any facsimile seal, or any reproduction of it,
of this state or any of its departments, agencies, or other
instrumentalities or of any of its political subdivisions is
guilty of a class E felony and shall be punishable by
imprisonment for a term not [less than two or] more than
[ten] four years in an institution designated by the state
division of corrections. Any person found guilty of a
violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
115.405. Any person making a sworn statement,
affidavit or declaration of candidacy required by this

SB 1294 6
subchapter who swears falsely or signs such document knowing
the statements therein are untrue shall be deemed guilty of
a class one election offense and subject to a term of
imprisonment not more than four years. Any person found
guilty of a violation of this section may be subject to an
extended prison term as a class E felony pursuant to section
558.016.
115.631. 1. The following offenses, and any others
specifically so described by law, shall be class one
election offenses and are deemed felonies connected with the
exercise of the right of suffrage. Conviction for any of
these offenses shall be punished by imprisonment for a term
of not more than [five] four years or by fine of not less
than two thousand five hundred dollars but not more than ten
thousand dollars or by both such imprisonment and fine:
(1) Willfully and falsely making any certificate,
affidavit, or statement required to be made pursuant to any
provision of this chapter, including but not limited to
statements specifically required to be made "under penalty
of perjury"; or in any other manner knowingly furnishing
false information to an election authority or election
official engaged in any lawful duty or action in such a way
as to hinder or mislead the authority or official in the
performance of official duties. If an individual willfully
and falsely makes any certificate, affidavit, or statement
required to be made under section 115.155, including but not
limited to statements specifically required to be made
"under penalty of perjury", such individual shall be guilty
of a class D felony;
(2) Voting more than once or voting at any election
knowing that the person is not entitled to vote or that the

SB 1294 7
person has already voted on the same day at another location
inside or outside the state of Missouri;
(3) Procuring any person to vote knowing the person is
not lawfully entitled to vote or knowingly procuring an
illegal vote to be cast at any election;
(4) Applying for a ballot in the name of any other
person, whether the name be that of a person living or dead
or of a fictitious person, or applying for a ballot in his
or her own or any other name after having once voted at the
election inside or outside the state of Missouri;
(5) Aiding, abetting or advising another person to
vote knowing the person is not legally entitled to vote or
knowingly aiding, abetting or advising another person to
cast an illegal vote;
(6) An election judge knowingly causing or permitting
any ballot to be in the ballot box at the opening of the
polls and before the voting commences;
(7) Knowingly furnishing any voter with a false or
fraudulent or bogus ballot, or knowingly practicing any
fraud upon a voter to induce him or her to cast a vote which
will be rejected, or otherwise defrauding him or her of his
or her vote;
(8) An election judge knowingly placing or attempting
to place or permitting any ballot, or paper having the
semblance of a ballot, to be placed in a ballot box at any
election unless the ballot is offered by a qualified voter
as provided by law;
(9) Knowingly placing or attempting to place or
causing to be placed any false or fraudulent or bogus ballot
in a ballot box at any election;
(10) Knowingly removing any legal ballot from a ballot
box for the purpose of changing the true and lawful count of

SB 1294 8
any election or in any other manner knowingly changing the
true and lawful count of any election;
(11) Knowingly altering, defacing, damaging,
destroying or concealing any ballot after it has been voted
for the purpose of changing the lawful count of any election;
(12) Knowingly altering, defacing, damaging,
destroying or concealing any poll list, report, affidavit,
return or certificate for the purpose of changing the lawful
count of any election;
(13) On the part of any person authorized to receive,
tally or count a poll list, tally sheet or election return,
receiving, tallying or counting a poll list, tally sheet or
election return the person knows is fraudulent, forged or
counterfeit, or knowingly making an incorrect account of any
election;
(14) On the part of any person whose duty it is to
grant certificates of election, or in any manner declare the
result of an election, granting a certificate to a person
the person knows is not entitled to receive the certificate,
or declaring any election result the person knows is based
upon fraudulent, fictitious or illegal votes or returns;
(15) Willfully destroying or damaging any official
ballots, whether marked or unmarked, after the ballots have
been prepared for use at an election and during the time
they are required by law to be preserved in the custody of
the election judges or the election authority;
(16) Willfully tampering with, disarranging, altering
the information on, defacing, impairing or destroying any
voting machine or marking device after the machine or
marking device has been prepared for use at an election and
during the time it is required by law to remain locked and
sealed with intent to impair the functioning of the machine

SB 1294 9
or marking device at an election, mislead any voter at the
election, or to destroy or change the count or record of
votes on such machine;
(17) Registering to vote knowing the person is not
legally entitled to register or registering in the name of
another person, whether the name be that of a person living
or dead or of a fictitious person;
(18) Procuring any other person to register knowing
the person is not legally entitled to register, or aiding,
abetting or advising another person to register knowing the
person is not legally entitled to register;
100 (19) Knowingly preparing, altering or substituting any
101 computer program or other counting equipment to give an
102 untrue or unlawful result of an election;
103 (20) On the part of any person assisting a blind or
104 disabled person to vote, knowingly failing to cast such
105 person's vote as such person directs;
106 (21) On the part of any registration or election
107 official, permitting any person to register to vote or to
108 vote when such official knows the person is not legally
109 entitled to register or not legally entitled to vote;
110 (22) On the part of a notary public acting in his or
111 her official capacity, knowingly violating any of the
112 provisions of this chapter or any provision of law
113 pertaining to elections;
114 (23) Violation of any of the provisions of sections
115 115.275 to 115.303, or of any provision of law pertaining to
116 absentee voting;
117 (24) Assisting a person to vote knowing such person is
118 not legally entitled to such assistance, or while assisting
119 a person to vote who is legally entitled to such assistance,
120 in any manner coercing, requesting or suggesting that the

SB 1294 10
121 voter vote for or against, or refrain from voting on any
122 question, ticket or candidate;
123 (25) Engaging in any act of violence, destruction of
124 property having a value of five hundred dollars or more, or
125 threatening an act of violence with the intent of denying a
126 person's lawful right to vote or to participate in the
127 election process; and
128 (26) Knowingly providing false information about
129 election procedures for the purpose of preventing any person
130 from going to the polls.
131 2. Any person found guilty of a violation of this
132 section may be subject to an extended prison term as a class
133 E felony pursuant to section 558.016.
115.633. 1. The following offenses, and any others
specifically so described by law, shall be class two
election offenses and are deemed felonies not connected with
the exercise of the right of suffrage. Conviction for any
of these offenses shall be punished by imprisonment for a
term of not more than [five] four years or by fine of not
less than two thousand five hundred dollars but not more
than ten thousand dollars or by both such imprisonment and
fine:
(1) On the day of election or before the counting of
votes is completed, willfully concealing, breaking, or
destroying any ballot box used or intended to be used at
such election or willfully or fraudulently concealing or
removing any ballot box from the custody of the election
judges;
(2) Willfully tampering with, disarranging, defacing,
materially altering, impairing, or destroying any voting
machine or automatic tabulating equipment owned or leased by
or loaned to an election authority.

SB 1294 11
2. Any person found guilty of a violation of this
section may be subject to an extended prison term as a class
E felony pursuant to section 558.016.
141.810. 1. Neither said trustees nor any salaried
employee of the land trust, provided for [herein] in
sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to
141.1015, shall receive any compensation, emolument, or
other profit directly or indirectly from the rental,
management, purchase, sale, or other disposition of any
lands held by such land trust other than the salaries,
expenses, and emoluments provided for [herein] in sections
141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015.
2. Any person convicted of violating this section
shall be deemed guilty of a class E felony and, upon
conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to serve not [less
than two nor] more than [five] four years [in the state
penitentiary] of imprisonment. Any person found guilty of a
violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
143.911. Any person who willfully attempts in any
manner to evade or defeat any tax imposed by sections
143.011 to 143.996 or the payment thereof shall[, in
addition to other penalties provided by law, and upon
conviction thereof, be fined not more than ten thousand
dollars, or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more
than one year or by not less than two nor more than five
years in the state penitentiary or by both fine and
imprisonment together with the cost of prosecution] be
guilty of a class E felony punishable by imprisonment for a
term not more than four years and may also be subject to a
fine of not more than ten thousand dollars. Any person

SB 1294 12
found guilty of a violation of this section may be subject
to an extended prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
144.157. 1. Any person required to collect,
truthfully account for, and pay over any tax imposed by
sections 67.1170 to 67.1180, sections 94.800 to 94.825, and
sections 144.010 to 144.525 and 144.600 to 144.745 who
willfully fails to collect such tax or truthfully account
for and pay over such tax or willfully attempts in any
manner to evade or defeat the tax or the payment thereof, or
who shall willfully and knowingly overcharge or overcollect
such tax with intent to make claim to any such overcharged
or overcollected amounts under section 144.190, shall[,] be
guilty of a class E felony punishable by imprisonment for a
term not more than four years. In addition to other
penalties provided by law, any person found guilty may be
liable to a penalty equal to the total amount of the tax
evaded, or not collected, or not accounted for and paid
over, or overcharged or overcollected.
2. For purposes of this section, the term "person"
includes an individual or an officer or employee of any
corporation, including an administratively dissolved
corporation or a foreign corporation that has had its
certificate of authority revoked, or a member or employee of
any partnership, who, as such officer, employee or member,
is under a duty to perform the act in respect of which the
violation occurs.
3. Any officers, directors, or statutory trustees of
any corporation, including administratively dissolved
corporations or foreign corporations that have had their
certificate of authority revoked, subject to the provisions
of sections 144.010 to 144.745, who has the direct control,
supervision or responsibility for filing returns and making

SB 1294 13
payment of the amount of tax imposed in accordance with
sections 144.010 to 144.745, and who fails to file such
return or make payment of all taxes due with the director of
revenue shall be guilty of a class E felony and subject to
the penalties provided in subsection 1 of this section. In
addition to other penalties provided by law, any person
found to have violated the terms outlined by sections
67.1170 to 67.1180, sections 94.800 to 94.825, sections
144.010 to 144.525, and sections 144.600 to 144.745 shall be
personally assessed for such amounts, including interest,
additions to tax and penalties thereon. This assessment
shall be imposed only in the event that the assessment on
the corporation is final, and such corporation fails to pay
such amounts to the director of revenue. Notice shall be
given of the director of revenue's intent to make the
assessment against such officers, directors, statutory
trustees or employees. The personal liability of such
officers, directors, statutory trustees or employees as
provided in this section shall survive the administrative
dissolution of the corporation or, if a foreign corporation,
the revocation of the corporation's certificate of
authority. Any person found guilty of a violation of this
section may be subject to an extended prison term pursuant
to section 558.016.
144.480. Any person required under sections 144.010 to
144.510 to pay any tax, or required by sections 144.010 to
144.510 to make a return, keep any records, or supply any
information, who with intent to defraud willfully fails to
pay such tax, make such return, keep such records, or supply
such information, at the time or times required by law,
shall[,] be guilty of a class E felony punishable by
imprisonment for a term not more than four years. In

SB 1294 14
addition to other penalties provided by law [and, upon
conviction thereof], any person found guilty pursuant to
this section may be fined not more than ten thousand
dollars[, or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more
than one year or by not less than two nor more than five
years in the state penitentiary or by both fine and
imprisonment together with the cost of prosecution]. Any
person found guilty of a violation of this section may be
subject to an extended prison term pursuant to section
558.016.
147.120. 1. If any corporation fails or refuses to
pay the taxes (including interest and penalties) assessed
against it after such assessment becomes final, the director
of revenue shall certify a list of the corporations so
delinquent to the attorney general who shall proceed
forthwith to collect the taxes. Suits for the collection of
the taxes may be brought in the name of the state in any
court of competent jurisdiction and any judgment rendered in
such court in favor of the state shall be a first lien on
all properties and assets of the corporation within this
state.
2. The director of revenue shall notify the secretary
of state of any corporation that fails or refuses to pay the
taxes, including interest and penalties, assessed against it
after such assessment becomes final and the secretary of
state shall then administratively dissolve any domestic
corporation that is delinquent pursuant to section 351.486
and shall revoke the certificate of authority of any foreign
corporation that is delinquent pursuant to section 351.602.
3. Any tax provided for pursuant to sections 147.010
to 147.120 not paid on or before the last day prescribed for
payment pursuant to sections 147.010 to 147.120 (determined

SB 1294 15
with regard to any extension of time for payment) shall be
collected with a penalty of five percent per month or
fractional part thereof until paid, not exceeding twenty-
five percent in the aggregate. Interest at the rate
determined by section 32.065 shall be added to any tax not
paid on or before the date due pursuant to sections 147.010
to 147.120 (determined without regard to any extension of
time for payment). Nothing in sections 147.010 to 147.120
shall be construed so as to permit any officer of this state
to remit or abate such interest.
4. If any corporation fails to pay any tax due within
the time prescribed pursuant to sections 147.010 to 147.120
or if any corporation makes errors and omissions in reports
or payments, and the director of revenue determines that
such action is the result of mistake or is due to
circumstances beyond reasonable control and that such
delinquency or inaccuracy was unavoidable or devoid of any
intent to evade the tax, the director of revenue may, at the
director's discretion, waive any penalty that would
otherwise be imposed.
5. The director of revenue shall set the interest rate
as determined in section 32.065. Such interest rate shall
be paid on all overpayments for the ensuing calendar year.
The interest shall accrue from the due date or the date of
overpayment, whichever is later. No interest shall be
allowed or paid if overpayment is refunded within four
months after the franchise tax report is filed.
6. Any notice of assessment of franchise tax due shall
be mailed to the corporation within three years after the
report was filed. The provisions of this subsection shall
apply to all reports filed after December 31, 1981.

SB 1294 16
7. If no report is filed or if a false and fraudulent
report is filed, a notice of assessment of franchise tax due
may be mailed to the corporation at any time.
8. If fraud or evasion on the part of a corporation or
anyone on behalf of a corporation is discovered, the
director of revenue shall determine the amount of which the
state has been defrauded, shall add to the amount so
determined a penalty equal to fifty percent thereof, and
shall assess the same against the corporation. The amount
so assessed shall be immediately due and payable; except
that, the director of revenue shall promptly thereafter give
to such corporation written notice of such assessment and
penalty, which notice shall be served by registered mail.
Such corporation shall have the right to petition for
hearing of such assessment, as is provided in sections
147.010 to 147.120.
9. Any person who willfully makes a false corporation
franchise tax report, or who willfully makes a false
statement in any report under oath or otherwise filed with
or transmitted to the director of revenue relating to the
amount of any franchise tax due pursuant to sections 147.010
to 147.120 shall, in addition to other penalties provided by
law and, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a class E
felony punishable by imprisonment for a term not more than
four years. Any person found convicted pursuant to this
section may be fined not more than ten thousand dollars[, or
be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one year
or by not less than two nor more than five years in the
state penitentiary or by both fine and imprisonment together
with the cost of prosecution]. Any person found guilty of a
violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.

SB 1294 17
10. The director of revenue shall administer and
enforce the tax imposed by sections 147.010 to 147.120, and
the director is authorized to make such rules and
regulations and to require such facts and information to be
reported as the director may deem necessary to enforce the
provisions of sections 147.010 to 147.120.
11. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant
to the authority of sections 147.010 to 147.120 shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536.
12. Except as otherwise specifically provided in
sections 147.010 to 147.120 the franchise tax shall be
administered as prescribed in the following provisions of
chapter 143: subsections 1 and 4 of section 143.551,
100 sections 143.561, 143.571, 143.621, 143.631, 143.641,
101 143.651, 143.661, 143.681, 143.691, 143.721 and 143.731,
102 subsection 1 of section 143.741, subsections 1, 2 and 5 of
103 section 143.751, sections 143.771 and 143.791, subsections
104 1, 2 and 4 of section 143.811, sections 143.831, 143.841 and
105 143.851, subsections 2 and 3 of section 143.861, and
106 sections 143.901, 143.902, 143.971 and 143.986.
149.071. Any person who shall, without the
authorization of the director of revenue, make or
manufacture, or who shall falsely or fraudulently forge,
counterfeit, reproduce, restore, or process any stamp,
impression, copy, facsimile, or other evidence for the
purpose of indicating the payment of the tax levied by this
chapter, or who shall knowingly or by a deceptive act use or
pass, or tender as true, or affix, impress, or imprint, by
use of any device, rubber stamp or by any other means, or
any package containing cigarettes, any unauthorized, false,
altered, forged, counterfeit or previously used stamp,

SB 1294 18
impressions, copies, facsimiles or other evidence of
cigarette tax payment, shall be guilty of a class E felony
and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment by
the state department of corrections for a term of not [less
than two years nor] more than [five] four years. Any person
found guilty of a violation of this section may be subject
to an extended prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
149.076. 1. No manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer
shall fail or refuse to make any return required by the
director, or refuse to permit the director or his or her
duly authorized representatives to examine records, papers,
files and equipment pertaining to the person's business made
taxable by this chapter. No person shall make an
incomplete, false or fraudulent return under this chapter,
or attempt to do anything to evade full disclosure of the
facts or to avoid the payment in whole or in part of the tax
or interest due.
2. Any person who files a false report or application
or makes a false entry in any record relating to the
purchase and sale of cigarettes shall be guilty of a class E
felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by
imprisonment by the state department of corrections for a
term of [not less than two years nor] more than [five] four
years. Any person found guilty of a violation of this
section may be subject to an extended prison term pursuant
to section 558.016.
192.2015. 1. Any registered caregiver who meets the
requirements of this section shall be eligible for a shared
care tax credit in an amount not to exceed five hundred
dollars to defray the cost of caring for an elderly person.
In order to be eligible for a shared care tax credit, a
registered caregiver shall:

SB 1294 19
(1) Care for an elderly person, age sixty or older,
who:
(a) Is physically or mentally incapable of living
alone, as determined and certified by his or her physician
licensed pursuant to chapter 334, or by the department staff
when an assessment has been completed for the purpose of
qualification for other services; and
(b) Requires assistance with activities of daily
living to the extent that without care and oversight at home
would require placement in a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 198; and
(c) Under no circumstances, is able or allowed to
operate a motor vehicle; and
(d) Does not receive funding or services through
Medicaid or social services block grant funding;
(2) Live in the same residence to give protective
oversight for the elderly person meeting the requirements
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection for an
aggregate of more than six months per tax year;
(3) Not receive monetary compensation for providing
care for the elderly person meeting the requirements
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection; and
(4) File the original completed and signed physician
certification for shared care tax credit form or the
original completed and signed department certification for
shared care tax credit form provided for in subsection 2 of
section 192.2010 along with such caregiver's Missouri
individual income tax return to the department of revenue.
2. The tax credit allowed by this section shall apply
to any year beginning after December 31, 1999.
3. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the

SB 1294 20
authority delegated in sections 192.2000 to 192.2020 shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. All rulemaking authority delegated prior
to August 28, 1999, is of no force and effect and repealed.
Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to repeal or
affect the validity of any rule filed or adopted prior to
August 28, 1999, if it fully complied with all applicable
provisions of law. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 1999, shall be invalid and void.
4. Any person who knowingly falsifies any document
required for the shared care tax credit shall be guilty of a
class E felony and subject to [the same penalties for
falsifying other tax documents as provided in chapter 143] a
term of imprisonment not more than four years, in addition
to other penalties provided by law. Any person found guilty
of a violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
194.275. 1. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2 of this section, a person that for valuable
consideration knowingly purchases or sells a part for any
purpose if removal of the whole body or a part from an
individual is intended to occur after the individual's death
commits a class D felony and, upon pleading or being found
guilty, is subject to a fine not exceeding fifty thousand
dollars or imprisonment not exceeding seven years, or both.
Any person found guilty of a violation of this section may

SB 1294 21
be subject to an extended prison term pursuant to section
558.016.
2. For purposes of this section, the term "valuable
consideration" does not include the reasonable payments
associated with the removal, transportation, implantation,
processing, preservation, quality control, and storage of
any part or a whole body.
194.280. Any person that in order to obtain a
financial gain knowingly falsifies, forges, conceals,
defaces, or obliterates a document of gift, an amendment or
revocation of a document of gift, or a refusal commits a
class D felony and, upon pleading or being found guilty, is
subject to a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars or
imprisonment not exceeding seven years, or both. Any person
found guilty of a violation of this section may be subject
to an extended prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
217.305. 1. The sheriff or other officer charged with
the delivery of persons committed to the department for
confinement in a correctional center shall deliver the
person to the reception and diagnostic center designated by
the director at times and dates as designated by the
director and shall receive a certificate of delivery of the
offender from the center.
2. Appropriate information relating to the offender
shall be provided to the department in a written or
electronic format, at or before the time the offender is
delivered to the department, including, but not limited to:
(1) A certified copy of the sentence from the clerk of
the sentencing court on the standardized form developed by
the office of state courts administrator. Such form shall
include specifics on any status violated, court-ordered
probation not supervised by the department, the offense

SB 1294 22
cycle number [and], any court-ordered restitution owed to
the victim, and sentencing calculation, including jail time
credit supplemented by a certificate of a sheriff or other
custodial officer from another jurisdiction having held the
person on the charge of the offense for which the sentence
of imprisonment is ordered pursuant to the provisions of
section 558.031;
(2) Available information provided in writing by the
prosecutor regarding the offender's age, crime for which
sentenced, probable cause statement, circumstances
surrounding the crime and sentence, names, telephone
numbers, and last known address of victims, victim impact
statements, and personal history, which may include facts
related to the offender's home environment, or work habits,
gang affiliations, if any, and previous convictions and
commitments. Such information shall be prepared by the
prosecuting attorney of the county or circuit attorney of
any city not within a county who was charged with the
offender's prosecution;
(3) Information provided by the sheriff or other
officer charged with the delivery of persons committed to
the department regarding the offender's physical and mental
health while in jail. All records on medication, care, and
treatment provided to the offender while in jail shall be
provided to the department prior to or upon delivery of the
offender. If the offender has had no physical or mental
health care or medications while in jail, the sheriff or
other officer shall certify that no physical or mental
health care or medication records are available. The
sheriff shall provide certification of all applicable jail-
time credit.

SB 1294 23
3. The department may refuse to accept any offender
who is delivered for confinement without all required
information.
217.362. 1. The department of corrections shall
design and implement an intensive long-term program for the
treatment of chronic nonviolent offenders with serious
substance abuse addictions who have not pleaded guilty to or
been convicted of a dangerous felony as defined in section
556.061.
2. Prior to sentencing, any judge considering an
offender for this program shall notify the department. The
potential candidate for the program shall be screened by the
department to determine eligibility. The department shall,
by regulation, establish eligibility criteria and inform the
court of such criteria. The department shall notify the
court as to the offender's eligibility and the availability
of space in the program. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, except as provided for in
section 558.019, if an offender is eligible and there is
adequate space, the court may sentence a person to the
program which shall consist of institutional drug or alcohol
treatment for a period of at least twelve and no more than
twenty-four months, as well as a term of incarceration. The
department shall determine the nature, intensity, duration,
and completion criteria of the education, treatment, and
aftercare portions of any program services provided.
Execution of the offender's term of incarceration shall be
suspended pending completion of said program. Allocation of
space in the program may be distributed by the department in
proportion to drug arrest patterns in the state. If the
court is advised that an offender is not eligible or that

SB 1294 24
there is no space available, the court shall consider other
authorized dispositions.
3. Upon successful completion of the program, the
division of probation and parole shall advise the sentencing
court of an offender's probationary release date thirty days
prior to release. If the court determines that probation is
not appropriate the court may order the execution of the
offender's sentence.
4. If it is determined by the department that the
offender has not successfully completed the program, or that
the offender is not cooperatively participating in the
program, the offender shall be removed from the program and
the court shall be advised. Failure of an offender to
complete the program shall cause the offender to serve the
sentence prescribed by the court and void the right to be
considered for probation on this sentence.
[5. An offender's first incarceration in a department
of corrections program pursuant to this section prior to
release on probation shall not be considered a previous
prison commitment for the purpose of determining a minimum
prison term pursuant to the provisions of section 558.019.]
217.655. 1. The parole board shall be responsible for
determining whether a person confined in the department
shall be paroled [or released conditionally as provided by
section 558.011]. The parole board shall receive
administrative support from the division of probation and
parole. The division of probation and parole shall provide
supervision to all persons referred by the circuit courts of
the state as provided by sections 217.750 and 217.760. The
parole board shall exercise independence in making decisions
about individual cases, but operate cooperatively within the
department and with other agencies, officials, courts, and

SB 1294 25
stakeholders to achieve systemic improvement including the
requirements of this section.
2. The parole board shall adopt parole guidelines to:
(1) Preserve finite prison capacity for the most
serious and violent offenders;
(2) Release supervision-manageable cases consistent
with section 217.690;
(3) Use finite resources guided by validated risk and
needs assessments;
(4) Support a seamless reentry process;
(5) Set appropriate conditions of supervision; and
(6) Develop effective strategies for responding to
violation behaviors.
3. The parole board shall collect, analyze, and apply
data in carrying out its responsibilities to achieve its
mission and end goals. The parole board shall establish
agency performance and outcome measures that are directly
responsive to statutory responsibilities and consistent with
agency goals for release decisions, supervision, revocation,
recidivism, and caseloads.
4. The parole board shall publish parole data,
including grant rates, revocation and recidivism rates,
length of time served, and successful supervision
completions, and other performance metrics.
5. The chairperson of the parole board shall employ
such employees as necessary to carry out its
responsibilities, serve as the appointing authority over
such employees, and provide for appropriate training to
members and staff, including communication skills.
6. The division of probation and parole shall provide
such programs as necessary to carry out its responsibilities
consistent with its goals and statutory obligations.

SB 1294 26
217.690. 1. All releases or paroles shall issue upon
order of the parole board, duly adopted.
2. Before ordering the parole of any offender, the
parole board shall conduct a validated risk and needs
assessment and evaluate the case under the rules governing
parole that are promulgated by the parole board. The parole
board shall then have the offender appear before a hearing
panel and shall conduct a personal interview with him or
her, unless waived by the offender, or if the guidelines
indicate the offender may be paroled without need for an
interview. The guidelines and rules shall not allow for the
waiver of a hearing if a victim requests a hearing. The
appearance or presence may occur by means of a
videoconference at the discretion of the parole board. A
parole may be ordered for the best interest of society when
there is a reasonable probability, based on the risk
assessment and indicators of release readiness, that the
person can be supervised under parole supervision and
successfully reintegrated into the community, not as an
award of clemency; it shall not be considered a reduction of
sentence or a pardon. Every offender while on parole shall
remain in the legal custody of the department but shall be
subject to the orders of the parole board.
3. The division of probation and parole has
discretionary authority to require the payment of a fee, not
to exceed sixty dollars per month, from every offender
placed under division supervision on probation, parole, or
conditional release, to waive all or part of any fee, to
sanction offenders for willful nonpayment of fees, and to
contract with a private entity for fee collections
services. All fees collected shall be deposited in the
inmate fund established in section 217.430. Fees collected

SB 1294 27
may be used to pay the costs of contracted collections
services. The fees collected may otherwise be used to
provide community corrections and intervention services for
offenders. Such services include substance abuse assessment
and treatment, mental health assessment and treatment,
electronic monitoring services, residential facilities
services, employment placement services, and other offender
community corrections or intervention services designated by
the division of probation and parole to assist offenders to
successfully complete probation, parole, or conditional
release. The division of probation and parole shall adopt
rules not inconsistent with law, in accordance with section
217.040, with respect to sanctioning offenders and with
respect to establishing, waiving, collecting, and using fees.
4. The parole board shall adopt rules not inconsistent
with law, in accordance with section 217.040, with respect
to the eligibility of offenders for parole, the conduct of
parole hearings or conditions to be imposed upon paroled
offenders. Whenever an order for parole is issued it shall
recite the conditions of such parole.
5. When considering parole for an offender with
consecutive sentences, the minimum term for eligibility for
parole shall be calculated by adding the minimum terms for
parole eligibility for each of the consecutive sentences,
except the minimum term for parole eligibility shall not
exceed the minimum term for parole eligibility for an
ordinary life sentence.
6. Any offender sentenced to a term of imprisonment
amounting to fifteen years or more or multiple terms of
imprisonment that, taken together, amount to fifteen or more
years who was under eighteen years of age at the time of the
commission of the offense or offenses may be eligible for

SB 1294 28
parole after serving fifteen years of incarceration,
regardless of whether the case is final for the purposes of
appeal, and may be eligible for reconsideration hearings in
accordance with regulations promulgated by the parole board.
7. The provisions of subsection 6 of this section
shall not apply to an offender found guilty of capital
murder, murder in the first degree or murder in the second
degree, when murder in the second degree is committed
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section
565.021, who was under eighteen years of age when the
offender committed the offense or offenses who may be found
ineligible for parole or whose parole eligibility may be
controlled by section 558.047 or 565.033.
8. Any offender under a sentence for first degree
murder who has been denied release on parole after a parole
hearing shall not be eligible for another parole hearing
until at least three years from the month of the parole
denial[; however, this subsection shall not prevent a
release pursuant to subsection 4 of section 558.011].
9. A victim who has requested an opportunity to be
heard shall receive notice that the parole board is
conducting an assessment of the offender's risk and
readiness for release and that the victim's input will be
particularly helpful when it pertains to safety concerns and
specific protective measures that may be beneficial to the
victim should the offender be granted release.
10. Parole hearings shall, at a minimum, contain the
following procedures:
(1) The victim or person representing the victim who
attends a hearing may be accompanied by one other person;
(2) The victim or person representing the victim who
attends a hearing shall have the option of giving testimony

SB 1294 29
in the presence of the inmate or to the hearing panel
without the inmate being present;
(3) The victim or person representing the victim may
100 call or write the parole board rather than attend the
101 hearing;
102 (4) The victim or person representing the victim may
103 have a personal meeting with a parole board member at the
104 parole board's central office;
105 (5) The judge, prosecuting attorney or circuit
106 attorney and a representative of the local law enforcement
107 agency investigating the crime shall be allowed to attend
108 the hearing or provide information to the hearing panel in
109 regard to the parole consideration; and
110 (6) The parole board shall evaluate information listed
111 in the juvenile sex offender registry pursuant to section
112 211.425, provided the offender is between the ages of
113 seventeen and twenty-one, as it impacts the safety of the
114 community.
115 11. The parole board shall notify any person of the
116 results of a parole eligibility hearing if the person
117 indicates to the parole board a desire to be notified.
118 12. The parole board may, at its discretion, require
119 any offender seeking parole to meet certain conditions
120 during the term of that parole so long as said conditions
121 are not illegal or impossible for the offender to perform.
122 These conditions may include an amount of restitution to the
123 state for the cost of that offender's incarceration.
124 13. Special parole conditions shall be responsive to
125 the assessed risk and needs of the offender or the need for
126 extraordinary supervision, such as electronic monitoring.
127 The parole board shall adopt rules to minimize the
128 conditions placed on low-risk cases, to frontload conditions

SB 1294 30
129 upon release, and to require the modification and reduction
130 of conditions based on the person's continuing stability in
131 the community. Parole board rules shall permit parole
132 conditions to be modified by parole officers with review and
133 approval by supervisors.
134 14. Nothing contained in this section shall be
135 construed to require the release of an offender on parole
136 nor to reduce the sentence of an offender heretofore
137 committed.
138 15. Beginning January 1, 2001, the parole board shall
139 not order a parole unless the offender has obtained a high
140 school diploma or its equivalent, or unless the parole board
141 is satisfied that the offender, while committed to the
142 custody of the department, has made an honest good-faith
143 effort to obtain a high school diploma or its equivalent;
144 provided that the director may waive this requirement by
145 certifying in writing to the parole board that the offender
146 has actively participated in mandatory education programs or
147 is academically unable to obtain a high school diploma or
148 its equivalent.
149 16. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
150 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
151 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
152 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
153 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
154 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
155 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
156 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
157 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
158 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
159 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
160 2005, shall be invalid and void.

SB 1294 31
217.760. 1. In all felony cases and class A
misdemeanor cases, the basis of which misdemeanor cases are
contained in chapters 565 and 566 and section 577.023, at
the request of a circuit judge of any circuit court, the
division of probation and parole shall assign one or more
state probation and parole officers to make an investigation
of the person convicted of the crime or offense before
sentence is imposed. In all felony cases in which the
recommended sentence established by the sentencing advisory
commission pursuant to subsection [7] 1 of section 558.019
includes probation but the recommendation of the prosecuting
attorney or circuit attorney does not include probation, the
division of probation and parole shall, prior to sentencing,
provide the judge with a report on available alternatives to
incarceration. If a presentence investigation report is
completed then the available alternatives shall be included
in the presentence investigation report.
2. The report of the presentence investigation or
preparole investigation shall contain any prior criminal
record of the defendant and such information about his or
her characteristics, his or her financial condition, his or
her social history, the circumstances affecting his or her
behavior as may be helpful in imposing sentence or in
granting probation or in the correctional treatment of the
defendant, information concerning the impact of the crime
upon the victim, the recommended sentence established by the
sentencing advisory commission and available alternatives to
incarceration including opportunities for restorative
justice, as well as a recommendation by the probation and
parole officer. The officer shall secure such other
information as may be required by the court and, whenever it

SB 1294 32
is practicable and needed, such investigation shall include
a physical and mental examination of the defendant.
252.220. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person to
place any explosive substance or preparation in any of the
waters of this state, whereby any fish which may inhabit
said waters may be killed, injured or destroyed; and no
person, by any such means, shall kill, catch or take any
fish from said waters; provided, however, that explosive
substances or preparations may be used in said waters, but
only with the permission and under the supervision of the
commission.
2. Any person violating any of the provisions of this
section shall be deemed guilty of a class E felony[,] and,
upon conviction, shall be fined not less than two hundred
dollars, nor more than one thousand dollars, or by
imprisonment [in the state penitentiary] for a term not more
than [two] four years, or by both such fine and
imprisonment, for each such offense. Any person found
guilty of a violation of this section may be subject to an
extended prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
257.430. The making of profit, directly or indirectly,
by any officer of any district organized under this chapter,
or by any other public officer within the state, out of any
contracts entered into by the district, or the use of any
money belonging to a district by loaning it or otherwise
using it, or by depositing the same in any manner, contrary
to law, or by removal of any money by any officer or by his
consent and placing it elsewhere than is prescribed either
by law or by the official acts of the board of trustees, for
the purpose of profit, constitutes a class E felony,
punishable by imprisonment for a term not exceeding [two]
four years, or a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars,

SB 1294 33
or both fine and imprisonment; and the officer offending
shall be liable personally and upon his official bond for
all losses to the district and for all profits realized by
such unlawful use of moneys. Any person found guilty of a
violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
260.425. 1. It is unlawful for any person to cause or
permit any acts or hazardous waste management practices
which violate sections 260.350 to 260.430 or any standard,
rule or regulation, order or license or permit term or
condition adopted or issued hereunder. In the event the
commission or the department determines that any provision
of sections 260.350 to 260.430 or any standard, rule or
regulation, order or determination, or license or permit
term or condition adopted or issued hereunder by the
commission or the department, or any filing requirement
under sections 260.350 to 260.430 or any provision which
this state is required to enforce under any federal
hazardous waste management act, is being, was, or is in
imminent danger of being violated, the commission or
department may, in addition to other remedies under sections
260.350 to 260.430, cause to have instituted a civil action
in any court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief
to prevent any such violation or further violation or for
the assessment of a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand
dollars per day for each day, or part thereof, the violation
occurred and continues to occur, or both, as the court deems
proper. A civil monetary penalty under this section shall
not be assessed for a violation where an administrative
penalty was assessed under section 260.412. The commission
or the department may request either the attorney general or
a prosecuting attorney to bring any action authorized in

SB 1294 34
this section in the name of the people of the state of
Missouri. Suit may be brought in any county where the
defendant's principal place of business is located or was
located at the time the violation occurred, or has or may
cause injury or threat to the health of humans or the
environment. Any offer of settlement to resolve a civil
penalty under this section shall be in writing, shall state
that an action for imposition of a civil penalty may be
initiated by the attorney general or a prosecuting attorney
representing the department under authority of this section,
and shall identify any dollar amount as an offer of
settlement which shall be negotiated in good faith through
conference, conciliation and persuasion.
2. Moneys received pursuant to this section which are
not required by Article IX, Section 7, of the Constitution
to be distributed to schools shall be deposited in the
hazardous waste fund created in section 260.391.
3. Any person who knowingly:
(1) Transports any hazardous waste to a facility which
is not authorized to receive such waste pursuant to sections
260.350 to 260.430 or permits or causes any other hazardous
waste transportation practice in violation of any provision
of sections 260.350 to 260.430;
(2) Treats, stores, or disposes of any hazardous waste
either:
(a) Without authorization to do so pursuant to
sections 260.350 to 260.430; or
(b) In knowing violation of any material condition or
requirement of such authorization; or
(c) In violation of any provision of sections 260.350
to 260.430;

SB 1294 35
(3) Makes any false material statement, representation
or certification in any application, label, permit, record,
report, manifest, or other document filed, maintained, or
required to be maintained under sections 260.350 to 260.430;
(4) Falsifies, tampers with, or renders inaccurate any
monitoring device or result therefrom used, filed,
maintained, or required to be maintained under sections
260.350 to 260.430;
(5) Generates, treats, stores, transports, disposes
of, or otherwise handles any hazardous waste, and who in
connection therewith knowingly destroys, alters or conceals
any record required to be maintained pursuant to sections
260.350 to 260.430; or
(6) Owns, maintains, or operates any hazardous waste
disposal facility in a manner which permits any acts or
hazardous waste management practices in violation of
sections 260.350 to 260.430[,];
shall[,] be guilty of a class E felony and subject to a term
of imprisonment not more than four years. Upon conviction,
any person found to be in violation of this section may be
punished by a fine of not less than [twenty-five] two
thousand five hundred dollars nor more than twenty-five
thousand dollars for each day of violation, [or by
confinement in the county jail for not more than one year,
or by both such fine and confinement] in addition to a
required term of imprisonment. Second and successive
convictions for violation of this section shall be punished
by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars nor more
than fifty thousand dollars for each day of violation[, or
by imprisonment for not less than ten years, or by both such
fine and imprisonment]. Any person found guilty of a

SB 1294 36
violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
4. Whenever the director or his designee observes or
has reason to believe any such person is violating or has
violated the provisions of sections 260.350 to 260.430
relating to hazardous waste facilities, the director or his
designee may request the sheriff or deputy sheriff of the
county where the hazardous waste facility is located, or any
law enforcement officer otherwise authorized by law to issue
a summons, to make investigation. If the officer views any
violation of sections 260.350 to 260.430 or has probable
100 cause to believe any violation of sections 260.350 to
101 260.430 is occurring or has occurred, he shall issue to the
102 owner or operator a summons, in lieu of arrest, which shall
103 state the nature of any alleged violations and shall command
104 the owner or operator to appear in circuit court, associate
105 division, at a stated time and place in answer thereto. If
106 the owner or operator shall fail to appear as commanded by
107 the summons, a warrant of arrest shall be issued.
108 5. In addition to the authority granted to it under
109 chapter 43, the Missouri state highway patrol, any of its
110 officers, or any other law enforcement officer, who has
111 probable cause to believe that such a violation of sections
112 260.350 to 260.430 has been committed may detain any
113 equipment involved in the violation and arrest the person
114 controlling or operating such equipment. Any such officer
115 shall also notify the department or the Missouri public
116 service commission as soon as practicable, which shall, in
117 addition, take whatever civil action they determine is
118 necessary to correct or eliminate such violation or any
119 threat to the health of humans or the environment. It shall
120 be the duty of the Missouri state highway patrol as it

SB 1294 37
121 pertains to highway use, and all other officers of the state
122 of Missouri charged with enforcement of criminal law, to
123 further the purposes of sections 260.350 to 260.430 and to
124 render and furnish to the department when requested all
125 information and assistance in their possession and in their
126 power.
127 6. The liabilities which shall be imposed pursuant to
128 any provision of sections 260.350 to 260.430 upon persons
129 violating the provisions of sections 260.350 to 260.430 or
130 any standard, rule or regulation, or license or permit term
131 or condition adopted or issued hereunder shall not be
132 imposed for any violation caused by a strike or an act of
133 God, war, riot or other catastrophe.
134 7. No provision of sections 260.350 to 260.430 shall
135 be construed to limit any action at law or in equity from
136 being brought by any person or political subdivision
137 aggrieved by any violation of sections 260.350 to 260.430
138 nor shall any provision be construed to prohibit any person
139 from exercising otherwise existing rights to suppress
140 nuisances.
268.151. Any person who shall brand, attempt to brand,
or cause to be branded the animals of another, or who shall
efface, deface, or obliterate or attempt to efface, deface,
or obliterate any brand upon any animal or animals of
another, or who shall brand, attempt to brand, or cause to
be branded the recorded brand of another on any animal shall
be guilty of a class E felony and [shall] may, in addition
to other penalties provided by law, be imprisoned by the
department of corrections for not more than [five] four
years. Any person found guilty of a violation of this
section may be subject to an extended prison term pursuant
to section 558.016.

SB 1294 38
311.460. Any person knowingly and willfully violating
any provisions of sections 311.410 to 311.450 shall be
deemed guilty of a class E felony and shall be punished,
upon conviction, by imprisonment [in the penitentiary] for a
term not exceeding [two] four years [or by imprisonment in
the county jail not exceeding one year] or by a fine not
exceeding one thousand dollars, or by both such fine and
imprisonment. Any person found guilty of a violation of
this section may be subject to an extended prison term
pursuant to section 558.016.
361.290. Any director, deputy, examiner, employee,
clerk or stenographer who shall violate his or her oath of
office or shall neglect or violate any of the duties imposed
upon him or her by this chapter, or shall be guilty of any
other misfeasance or malfeasance in office for which no
other or different punishment is by this chapter provided,
shall be deemed guilty of a class E felony, and upon
conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment [in the
penitentiary] for a term [of] not [less than two years nor]
exceeding [five] four years, or by a fine of not less than
one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, [or
by imprisonment in the county or city jail for not less than
one month nor more than twelve months,] or by both such fine
and imprisonment; and upon indictment of any such director,
deputy, examiner, clerk or stenographer for any violation of
this chapter, such officer or employee shall be disqualified
from further discharging the duties of such office or
position until such indictment is fully disposed of. Any
person found guilty of a violation of this section may be
subject to an extended prison term pursuant to section
558.016.

SB 1294 39
362.100. Any person who shall, contrary to any of the
provisions of law, knowingly aid, abet or participate
directly or indirectly in issuing or selling or causing to
be issued or sold any share or shares of stock in any bank
or trust company shall be deemed guilty of a class E felony
and, upon conviction, thereof shall be punished by
imprisonment by the department of corrections [and human
resources] for a term not exceeding [five] four years or [by
confinement in the county jail for a term not exceeding six
months or] by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars,
or by both such fine and confinement. Any person found
guilty of a violation of this section may be subject to an
extended prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
362.171. Any officer, director, agent, clerk or
employee of any bank or trust company who willfully and
knowingly makes or concurs in making any loan, either
directly or indirectly, to any individual, partnership or
corporation or by means of letters of credit, by acceptance
of drafts or by discount or purchase of notes, bills of
exchange or other obligation of any person, partnership or
corporation, in excess of the amounts set out in section
362.170, shall be deemed guilty of a class E felony and,
upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment [in the
penitentiary] for not [less than two years nor] more than
[ten] four years [or by imprisonment in the county jail for
not exceeding one year] or by a fine not exceeding five
hundred dollars, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Any
person found guilty of a violation of this section may be
subject to an extended prison term pursuant to section
558.016.
375.350. 1. No insurance company shall, directly or
indirectly, purchase or hold, either absolutely or as

SB 1294 40
collateral, its own stock, after the same has been once
issued, without prior approval of the director of the
department of commerce and insurance. The written
application shall specify the number of shares offered,
their description, the price offered by the company, the
book value of said shares and any other pertinent
information regarding the value of said shares. A copy of
said application shall be given to the seller prior to the
filing of said written application with the director of the
department of commerce and insurance. This section shall
not prevent a company from buying its own stock, if the same
shall be forfeited and sold to the company for nonpayment of
assessments thereon, in which case it shall be treated and
issued as part of the original stock. Any person willfully
making a false statement or representation in the
application mentioned above shall be deemed guilty of a
class E felony and may be imprisoned for a period of not
[less than two years nor] more than [five] four years. Any
person found guilty of a violation of this section may be
subject to an extended prison term pursuant to section
558.016.
2. Notwithstanding the limitations set out in
subsection 1 of this section, an insurance company may
purchase or otherwise acquire its own stock, after the same
has once been issued, without prior approval of the director
of the department of commerce and insurance provided that:
(1) The insurance company does not thereby reduce its
capital and surplus below the minimums required by law for
such company to continue to do business; and
(2) The insurance company, within ten days after the
end of any three-month period in which it acquires more than
five percent of any class of its outstanding shares, files a

SB 1294 41
report with the director of the department of commerce and
insurance showing:
(a) The date of such purchase;
(b) The class of stock purchased;
(c) The number of shares of each class so purchased;
(d) The aggregate price paid for such shares of each
class so purchased; and
(e) The authorized capital, actual capital, and
surplus of such company immediately prior to such purchase.
3. No shares which are or have been reacquired,
purchased, pledged, or held by an insurance company pursuant
to subsection 1 or 2 of this section shall be considered an
admitted asset, nor shall be considered in determining the
solvency of any insurance company.
375.390. No officer, stockholder, agent or employee of
any insurance company, formed under the laws of this state,
or doing business herein, shall, directly or indirectly, use
or employ, or permit others to use or employ, any of the
money, funds or securities of such company for private
profit or gain, and any such use shall be deemed a class E
felony, punishable, upon conviction, by imprisonment [in the
penitentiary] for a term not [less than two years nor] more
than [five] four years for each offense. Any person found
guilty of a violation of this section may be subject to an
extended prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
375.410. Any public official failing, neglecting or
refusing to comply with any of the provisions of [sections
375.390 and] section 375.400 shall be deemed guilty of a
misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less
than five hundred dollars and forfeit his office.
375.470. If said director or his deputy shall
willfully fail, refuse or neglect to faithfully keep,

SB 1294 42
deposit, account or surrender, in the manner by law
authorized or required, any such securities as aforesaid,
transferred to and received by him or into his custody,
under the provisions of law, such director shall be
responsible upon his official bond, and suit may be brought
upon said bond by any person injured; and said director or
his deputy so offending shall, upon conviction thereof, be
adjudged guilty of a class C felony, and punished by a fine
not exceeding ten thousand dollars, and by imprisonment [in
the state penitentiary] for a term not less than [two] three
or more than ten years[; and for any other willful violation
or failure or neglect to perform any duty prescribe by law,
and pertaining to his office, said director or his deputy,
upon conviction thereof, shall be deemed guilty of a
misdemeanor, and punished by a fine not exceeding one
thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail not
exceeding twelve months, or by both such fine and
imprisonment]. Any person found guilty of a violation of
this section may be subject to an extended prison term
pursuant to section 558.016.
386.560. Any person who shall willfully make any false
entry in the accounts, books of account, records, or
memoranda kept by any corporation, person, or public utility
governed by the provisions of this chapter, or who shall
willfully destroy, mutilate, alter, or by any other means or
device falsify the record of any such account, book of
accounts, record, or memoranda, or who shall willfully
neglect or fail to make full, true, and correct entries of
such account, book of accounts, record, or memoranda of all
facts and transactions appertaining to the business of such
corporations, persons, or public utilities, or who shall
falsely make any statement required to be made to the public

SB 1294 43
service commission, in which a penalty has not heretofore
been provided for, shall be deemed guilty of a class E
felony[,] and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine
of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for a term of not [less
than two years nor] more than [five] four years, or by both
such fine and imprisonment; provided, that the commission
may, in its discretion, issue orders specifying such
operating, accounting, or financial papers, records, books,
blanks, tickets, stubs, or documents, of carriers which may
after a reasonable time be destroyed, and prescribing the
length of time such books, papers, or documents shall be
preserved; and provided further, that such orders shall be
in harmony with those of the Interstate Commerce
Commission. Any person found guilty of a violation of this
section may be subject to an extended prison term pursuant
to section 558.016.
387.290. 1. The division of motor carrier and
railroad safety shall have the power to require motor
carriers to account for the disposition of the proceeds of
all sales of stocks, bonds, notes, and other evidences of
indebtedness in such form and detail as it may deem
advisable and to establish such rules and regulations as it
may deem reasonable and necessary to insure the disposition
of such proceeds for the purpose or purposes specified in
its order.
2. All stock, and every bond, note or evidence of
indebtedness, of a motor carrier issued without an order of
the division authorizing the same then in effect shall be
void, and likewise all stock, and every bond, note or other
evidence of indebtedness, of a motor carrier issued with the
authorization of the division, but not conforming in its

SB 1294 44
provisions to the provisions, if any, which it is required
by the order of authorization of the division to contain,
shall be void; but no failure in any other respect to comply
with the terms or conditions of the order of authorization
of the division shall render void any stock, or any bond,
note, or other evidence of indebtedness, except as to a
corporation or person taking the same otherwise than in good
faith and for value and without actual notice.
3. Every motor carrier, which directly or indirectly
issues or causes to be issued, any stock or stock
certificates, or bond, note, or other evidence of
indebtedness, in nonconformity with the order of the
division authorizing the same, or contrary to the provisions
of this chapter, or of the constitution of the state, or
which applies the proceeds from the sale thereof, or any
part thereof, to any purpose other than the purpose or
purposes specified in the division's order, as herein
provided, or to any purpose specified in the division's
order in excess of the amount in said order authorized for
such purpose, is subject to a penalty of not less than five
hundred dollars nor more than twenty thousand dollars for
each offense.
4. Every officer, agent, or employee of a motor
carrier, and every other person who knowingly authorizes,
directs, aids in, issues or executes, or causes to be issued
or executed, any stock, or bond, note, or other evidence of
indebtedness, in nonconformity with the order of the
division authorizing the same, or contrary to the provisions
of this chapter, or of the constitution of this state, or
who, in any proceeding before the division, knowingly makes
any false statement or representation, or with knowledge of
its falsity files or causes to be filed with the division

SB 1294 45
any false statement or representation which said statement
or representation so made, filed or caused to be filed may
tend in any way to influence the division to make an order
authorizing the issue of any stock, or any bond, note, or
other evidence of indebtedness, or which results in
procuring from the division the making of any such order, or
who, with knowledge that any false statement or
representation was made to the division in any proceeding,
tending in any way to influence the division to make such
order, issues or executes or negotiates, or causes to be
issued, executed or negotiated any such stock, or bond,
note, or other evidence of indebtedness, or who directly or
indirectly, knowingly applies, or causes or assists to be
applied the proceeds or any part thereof, from the sale of
any stock, or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness,
to any purpose not specified in the division's order, or to
any purpose specified in the division's order in excess of
the amount authorized for such purpose, or who, with
knowledge that any stock, or bond, note or other evidence of
indebtedness, has been issued or executed in violation of
any of the provisions of this chapter, negotiates, or causes
the same to be negotiated, shall be deemed guilty of a class
E felony[,] and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a
fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for a term not
[less than two years nor] more than [five] four years, or by
both such fine and imprisonment. Any person found guilty of
a violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
5. No provision of this chapter, and no deed or act
done or performed under or in connection therewith, shall be
held or construed to obligate the state of Missouri to pay

SB 1294 46
or guarantee, in any manner whatsoever, any stock, or bond,
note, or other evidence of indebtedness, authorized, issued
or executed under the provisions of this chapter.
6. All stocks, and every bond, note, or other evidence
of indebtedness issued by any motor carrier after this
chapter takes effect, upon the authority of any articles of
incorporation or amendments thereto or vote of the
stockholders or directors filed, taken or had, or other
proceedings taken or had, previous to the taking effect of
this chapter, shall be void, unless an order of the division
authorizing the issue of such stock, or bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness shall have been obtained
from the division prior to such issue. The division may by
its order impose such condition or conditions as it may deem
reasonable and necessary.
392.330. 1. The commission shall have the power to
require every telecommunications company to account for the
disposition of the proceeds of all sales of stocks, bonds,
notes, and other evidence of indebtedness, in such form and
detail as it may deem advisable, and to establish such rules
and regulations as it may deem reasonable and necessary to
ensure the disposition of such proceeds for the purpose or
purposes specified in its order. No rule or portion of a
rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall
become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to
the provisions of section 536.024.
2. All stock and every bond, note, or other evidence
of indebtedness of a telecommunications company issued
without an order of the commission authorizing the same then
in effect shall be void, and likewise all stock and every
bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness of a
telecommunications company issued with the authorization of

SB 1294 47
the commission, but not conforming in its provisions to the
provisions, if any, which it is required by the order of
authorization of the commission to contain, shall be void;
but no failure in any other respect to comply with the terms
or conditions of the order of authorization of the
commission shall render void any stock or any bond, note, or
other evidence of indebtedness, except as to a corporation
or person taking the same otherwise than in good faith and
for value and without actual notice.
3. Every telecommunications company which, directly or
indirectly, issues or causes to be issued any stock, or
bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, in
nonconformity with the order of the commission authorizing
the same, or contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or
of the constitution of this state, or which applies the
proceeds from the sale thereof, or any part thereof, to any
purpose other than the purpose or purposes specified in the
commission's order in excess of the amount in such order
authorized for the purpose, is subject to a penalty of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than twenty thousand
dollars for each offense.
4. Every officer, agent, or employee of a
telecommunications company and every other person who
knowingly authorizes, directs, aids in, issues or executes,
or causes to be issued or executed, any stock, bond, note,
or other evidence of indebtedness, in nonconformity with the
order of the commission authorizing the same, or contrary to
the provisions of sections 392.190 to 392.360, or to the
constitution of this state, or who, in any proceeding before
the commission, knowingly makes any false statement or
representation or with knowledge of its falsity files or
causes to be filed with the commission any false statement

SB 1294 48
or representation, which said statement or representation so
made, filed or caused to be filed, may tend in any way to
influence the commission to make an order authorizing the
issue of any stock, or any bond, note, or other evidence of
indebtedness, or which results in the procuring from the
commission the making of any such order, or who, with
knowledge that any false statement or representation was
made to the commission, in any proceeding, tending in any
way to influence the commission to make such order, issues
or executes or negotiates, or causes to be issued or
executed or negotiated any such stock, or bond, note, or
other evidence of indebtedness, or who, directly or
indirectly, knowingly applies, or causes or assists to be
applied, the proceeds, or any part thereof, from the sale of
any stock, bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, to
any purpose not specified in the commission's order, or to
any purpose specified in the commission's order in excess of
the amount authorized for such purpose, or who, with
knowledge that any stock, or bond, note, or other evidence
of indebtedness has been issued or executed in violation of
any of the provisions of this chapter, negotiates, or causes
to be negotiated, any stock, bond, note, or other evidence
of indebtedness, shall be deemed guilty of a class E felony,
and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not
less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars, or by imprisonment for a term not [less than two
years nor] more than [five] four years, or by both such fine
and imprisonment. Any person found guilty of a violation of
this section may be subject to an extended prison term
pursuant to section 558.016.
5. No provision of this chapter, and no deed or act
done or performed under or in connection therewith, shall be

SB 1294 49
held or construed to obligate the state of Missouri, to pay
or guarantee, in any manner whatsoever, any stock, or bond,
note, or other evidence of indebtedness, authorized, issued
or executed under the provisions of sections 392.190 to
392.360.
6. All stocks, and every bond, note, or other evidence
of indebtedness issued by any public utility after this
chapter takes effect, upon the authority of any articles of
incorporation or amendments thereto or vote of the
stockholders or directors filed, taken or had, or other
proceedings taken or had, previous to the taking effect of
this law, shall be void, unless an order of the commission
authorizing the issue of such stocks, bonds, notes, or other
evidences of indebtedness shall have been obtained from the
commission prior to such issue. The commission may by its
order impose such condition or conditions as it may deem
reasonable and necessary.
7. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this
100 section, the commission can approve all issues of stock,
101 bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness of a
102 telecommunications company which were issued without prior
103 approval when it can be shown that the stocks, bonds, notes,
104 or other evidence of indebtedness were issued for purposes
105 authorized by section 392.310, and were issued in good faith
106 without knowledge of the requirement of obtaining prior
107 approval.
393.220. 1. The commission shall have power to
require gas corporations, electrical corporations, water
corporations, and sewer corporations to account for the
disposition of the proceeds of all sales of stocks, bonds,
notes, and other evidences of indebtedness in such form and
detail as it may deem advisable, and to establish such rules

SB 1294 50
and regulations as it may deem reasonable and necessary to
insure the disposition of such proceeds for the purpose or
purposes specified in its order.
2. All stock, and every bond, note, or other evidence
of indebtedness of a gas corporation, electrical
corporation, water corporation, or sewer corporation issued
without an order of the commission authorizing the same then
in effect shall be void, and likewise all stock, and every
bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness of a gas
corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation, or
sewer corporation, issued with the authorization of the
commission, but not conforming in its provisions to the
provisions, if any, which it is required by the order of
authorization of the commission to contain, shall be void;
but no failure in any other respect to comply with the terms
or conditions of the order of authorization of the
commission shall render void any stock, or any bond, note,
or other evidence of indebtedness, except as to a
corporation or person taking the same otherwise than in good
faith and for value and without actual notice.
3. Every gas corporation, electrical corporation,
water corporation, or sewer corporation which, directly or
indirectly, issues or causes to be issued any stock or bond,
note, or other evidence of indebtedness, in nonconformity
with the order of the commission authorizing the same, or
contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or the
constitution of this state, or which applies the proceeds
from the sale thereof, or any part thereof, to any purpose
other than the purpose or purposes specified in the
commission's order in excess of the amount in said order
authorized for the purpose, is subject to a penalty of not

SB 1294 51
less than five hundred dollars nor more than twenty thousand
dollars for each offense.
4. Every officer, agent, or employee of a gas
corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation, or
sewer corporation, and every other person who knowingly
authorizes, directs, aids in, issues or executes, or causes
to be issued or executed, any stock or bond, note, or other
evidence of indebtedness, in nonconformity with the order of
the commission authorizing the same, or contrary to the
provisions of this chapter, or to the constitution of this
state, or who, in any proceeding before the commission,
knowingly makes any false statement or representation or
with knowledge of its falsity files or causes to be filed
with the commission any false statement or representation,
which said statement or representation so made, filed or
caused to be filed may tend in any way to influence the
commission to make an order authorizing an issue of stock,
or any bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness, or
which results in the procuring from the commission the
making of any such order, or who, with knowledge that any
false statement or representation was made to the
commission, in any proceeding, tending in any way to
influence the commission to make such an order, issues or
executes or negotiates, or causes to be issued, executed or
negotiated any such stock or bond, note, or other evidence
of indebtedness, or who, directly or indirectly, knowingly
applies, or causes or assists to be applied the proceeds, or
any part thereof, from the sale of any stock or bond, note,
or other evidence of indebtedness, to any purpose not
specified in the commission's order, or to any purpose
specified in the commission's order, in excess of the amount
authorized for such purpose, or who, with knowledge that any

SB 1294 52
stock or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, has
been issued or executed in violation of any of the
provisions of this chapter, negotiates, or causes the same
to be negotiated, shall be deemed guilty of a class E
felony[,] and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine
of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for not [less than two
years nor] more than [five] four years, or by both such fine
and imprisonment. Any person found guilty of a violation of
this section may be subject to an extended prison term
pursuant to section 558.016.
5. No provision of this chapter, and no deed or act
done or performed under or in connection therewith, shall be
held or construed to obligate the state of Missouri to pay
or guarantee in any manner whatsoever, any stock or bond,
note, or other evidence of indebtedness, authorized, issued
or executed under the provisions of this chapter.
6. All stocks and bonds, notes, and other evidences of
indebtedness issued by any public utility after this law
takes effect, upon the authority of any articles of
incorporation or amendments thereto or vote of the
stockholders or directors filed, taken or had, or other
proceedings taken or had, previous to the taking effect of
this chapter, shall be void, unless an order of the
commission authorizing the issue of such stocks, bonds,
notes, or other evidences of indebtedness shall have been
obtained from the commission prior to such issue. The
commission may by its order impose such condition or
conditions as it may deem reasonable and necessary.
7. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this
100 section to the contrary, the commission can approve all
101 issues of stock, bonds, notes, or other evidence of

SB 1294 53
102 indebtedness of a gas corporation, electrical corporation,
103 water corporation, or sewer corporation, which were issued
104 without prior approval when it can be shown that the stocks,
105 bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness were issued
106 for purposes authorized by section 393.200, and were issued
107 in good faith without knowledge of the requirement of
108 obtaining prior approval.
409.109. A person who willfully violates section
409.108 shall be deemed guilty of a class C felony and, upon
conviction, be fined not more than five hundred thousand
dollars or imprisoned not less than three years and not more
than ten years, or both. The proper prosecuting attorney
with or without a criminal reference from the commissioner,
or the attorney general under section 27.030, may institute
criminal proceedings under this section. Any person found
guilty of a violation of this section may be subject to an
extended prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
409.5-501. 1. It is unlawful for a person, in
connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of a security,
directly or indirectly:
(1) To employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;
(2) To make an untrue statement of a material fact or
to omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make
the statement made, in the light of the circumstances under
which it is made, not misleading; or
(3) To engage in an act, practice, or course of
business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit
upon another person.
2. A person who willfully violates the terms of this
section shall be deemed guilty of a class C felony and shall
be subject to a term of imprisonment not less than three
years and not more than ten years. Any person found guilty

SB 1294 54
of a violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
409.5-505. 1. It is unlawful for a person to make or
cause to be made, in a record that is used in an action or
proceeding or filed under this act, a statement that, at the
time and in the light of the circumstances under which it is
made, is false or misleading in a material respect, or, in
connection with the statement, to omit to state a material
fact necessary to make the statement made, in the light of
the circumstances under which it was made, not false or
misleading.
2. A person who willfully violates the terms of this
section shall be deemed guilty of a class C felony and shall
be subject to a term of imprisonment not less than three
years and not more than ten years. Any person found guilty
of a violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
409.5-508. (a) A person commits the [crime] offense
of criminal securities fraud when such person willfully
violates section 409.5-501.
(b) A person commits a criminal securities violation
when such person willfully violates any other provision of
this act, or a rule adopted or order issued under this act,
except section 409.5-504 or the notice filing requirements
of section 409.3-302 or 409.4-405, or that willfully
violates section 409.5-505 knowing the statement made to be
false or misleading in a material respect.
(c) A person convicted of criminal securities fraud or
any other criminal securities violation shall be deemed
guilty of a class C felony and fined not more than one
million dollars or imprisoned for a term not less than three
years nor more than ten years, or both, and if the violation

SB 1294 55
was committed against an elderly or disabled person, then
the fine shall be not less than fifty thousand dollars. Any
person found guilty of a violation of this section may be
subject to an extended prison term pursuant to section
558.016. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Disabled person", a person with a physical or
mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of
the major life activities of such individual, a record of
such impairment, or being regarded as having such an
impairment;
(2) "Elderly person", a person sixty years of age or
older.
(d) An individual convicted of violating a rule or
order under this act may be fined, but may not be
imprisoned, if the individual did not have knowledge of the
rule or order.
(e) The attorney general or the proper prosecuting
attorney with or without a reference from the commissioner
may institute criminal proceedings under this act.
(f) This act does not limit the power of this state to
punish a person for conduct that constitutes a crime under
other laws of this state.
411.611. A warehouseman who issues or aids in issuing
a receipt knowing that the grain for which the receipt is
issued has not been actually received by the warehouseman,
or is not under [his] the actual control of the warehouseman
at the time of issuing the receipt, is guilty of a class E
felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished for each
offense by imprisonment by the department of corrections
[and human resources] for a term not to exceed [five] four
years. Any person found guilty of a violation of this

SB 1294 56
section may be subject to an extended prison term pursuant
to section 558.016.
411.621. A warehouseman who fraudulently issues or
aids in fraudulently issuing a receipt for grain, knowing
that it contains any false statement, is guilty of a class E
felony[,] and, upon conviction, shall be punished for each
offense by imprisonment by the department of corrections
[and human resources] for a term not [less than two years
nor] more than [five] four years. Any person found guilty
of a violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
411.641. A warehouseman who delivers grain out of his
or her possession, knowing that a negotiable receipt, the
negotiation of which would transfer the right to the
possession of that grain, is outstanding and uncancelled,
without obtaining possession of the receipt at or before the
time of the delivery, is guilty of a class E felony[,] and,
upon conviction, shall be punished for each offense by
imprisonment by the department of corrections [and human
resources] for a term not [less than two nor] more than
[five] four years. Any person found guilty of a violation
of this section may be subject to an extended prison term
pursuant to section 558.016.
411.651. Any person who deposits grain to which [he]
the person has not title, or upon which there is a lien or
mortgage, and who takes for the grain a negotiable receipt
which [he] the person afterward negotiated for value with
intent to defraud, or without disclosing his or her want of
title, or the existence of the lien or mortgage, is guilty
of a [crime,] class E felony and, upon conviction, shall be
punished for each offense by imprisonment by the department
of corrections [and human resources] for a term not

SB 1294 57
exceeding [five] four years, or by a fine not exceeding five
thousand dollars, or both. Any person found guilty of a
violation of this section may be subject to an extended
prison term pursuant to section 558.016.
556.061. In this code, unless the context requires a
different definition, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Access", to instruct, communicate with, store
data in, retrieve or extract data from, or otherwise make
any use of any resources of, a computer, computer system, or
computer network;
(2) "Affirmative defense":
(a) The defense referred to is not submitted to the
trier of fact unless supported by evidence; and
(b) If the defense is submitted to the trier of fact
the defendant has the burden of persuasion that the defense
is more probably true than not;
(3) "Burden of injecting the issue":
(a) The issue referred to is not submitted to the
trier of fact unless supported by evidence; and
(b) If the issue is submitted to the trier of fact any
reasonable doubt on the issue requires a finding for the
defendant on that issue;
(4) "Commercial film and photographic print
processor", any person who develops exposed photographic
film into negatives, slides or prints, or who makes prints
from negatives or slides, for compensation. The term
commercial film and photographic print processor shall
include all employees of such persons but shall not include
a person who develops film or makes prints for a public
agency;
(5) "Computer", the box that houses the central
processing unit (CPU), along with any internal storage

SB 1294 58
devices, such as internal hard drives, and internal
communication devices, such as internal modems capable of
sending or receiving electronic mail or fax cards, along
with any other hardware stored or housed internally. Thus,
computer refers to hardware, software and data contained in
the main unit. Printers, external modems attached by cable
to the main unit, monitors, and other external attachments
will be referred to collectively as peripherals and
discussed individually when appropriate. When the computer
and all peripherals are referred to as a package, the term
"computer system" is used. Information refers to all the
information on a computer system including both software
applications and data;
(6) "Computer equipment", computers, terminals, data
storage devices, and all other computer hardware associated
with a computer system or network;
(7) "Computer hardware", all equipment which can
collect, analyze, create, display, convert, store, conceal
or transmit electronic, magnetic, optical or similar
computer impulses or data. Hardware includes, but is not
limited to, any data processing devices, such as central
processing units, memory typewriters and self-contained
laptop or notebook computers; internal and peripheral
storage devices, transistor-like binary devices and other
memory storage devices, such as floppy disks, removable
disks, compact disks, digital video disks, magnetic tape,
hard drive, optical disks and digital memory; local area
networks, such as two or more computers connected together
to a central computer server via cable or modem; peripheral
input or output devices, such as keyboards, printers,
scanners, plotters, video display monitors and optical
readers; and related communication devices, such as modems,

SB 1294 59
cables and connections, recording equipment, RAM or ROM
units, acoustic couplers, automatic dialers, speed dialers,
programmable telephone dialing or signaling devices and
electronic tone-generating devices; as well as any devices,
mechanisms or parts that can be used to restrict access to
computer hardware, such as physical keys and locks;
(8) "Computer network", two or more interconnected
computers or computer systems;
(9) "Computer program", a set of instructions,
statements, or related data that directs or is intended to
direct a computer to perform certain functions;
(10) "Computer software", digital information which
can be interpreted by a computer and any of its related
components to direct the way they work. Software is stored
in electronic, magnetic, optical or other digital form. The
term commonly includes programs to run operating systems and
applications, such as word processing, graphic, or
spreadsheet programs, utilities, compilers, interpreters and
communications programs;
(11) "Computer-related documentation", written,
recorded, printed or electronically stored material which
explains or illustrates how to configure or use computer
hardware, software or other related items;
(12) "Computer system", a set of related, connected or
unconnected, computer equipment, data, or software;
(13) "Confinement":
(a) A person is in confinement when such person is
held in a place of confinement pursuant to arrest or order
of a court, and remains in confinement until:
a. A court orders the person's release; or
b. The person is released on bail, bond, or
recognizance, personal or otherwise; or

SB 1294 60
c. A public servant having the legal power and duty to
confine the person authorizes his release without guard and
without condition that he return to confinement;
(b) A person is not in confinement if:
a. The person is on probation or parole, temporary or
otherwise; or
b. The person is under sentence to serve a term of
100 confinement which is not continuous, or is serving a
101 sentence under a work-release program, and in either such
102 case is not being held in a place of confinement or is not
103 being held under guard by a person having the legal power
104 and duty to transport the person to or from a place of
105 confinement;
106 (14) "Consent": consent or lack of consent may be
107 expressed or implied. Assent does not constitute consent if:
108 (a) It is given by a person who lacks the mental
109 capacity to authorize the conduct charged to constitute the
110 offense and such mental incapacity is manifest or known to
111 the actor; or
112 (b) It is given by a person who by reason of youth,
113 mental disease or defect, intoxication, a drug-induced
114 state, or any other reason is manifestly unable or known by
115 the actor to be unable to make a reasonable judgment as to
116 the nature or harmfulness of the conduct charged to
117 constitute the offense; or
118 (c) It is induced by force, duress or deception;
119 (15) "Controlled substance", a drug, substance, or
120 immediate precursor in Schedules I through V as defined in
121 chapter 195;
122 (16) "Criminal negligence", failure to be aware of a
123 substantial and unjustifiable risk that circumstances exist
124 or a result will follow, and such failure constitutes a

SB 1294 61
125 gross deviation from the standard of care which a reasonable
126 person would exercise in the situation;
127 (17) "Custody", a person is in custody when he or she
128 has been arrested but has not been delivered to a place of
129 confinement;
130 (18) "Damage", when used in relation to a computer
131 system or network, means any alteration, deletion, or
132 destruction of any part of the computer system or network;
133 (19) "Dangerous felony", the felonies of arson in the
134 first degree, assault in the first degree, attempted rape in
135 the first degree if physical injury results, attempted
136 forcible rape if physical injury results, attempted sodomy
137 in the first degree if physical injury results, attempted
138 forcible sodomy if physical injury results, rape in the
139 first degree, forcible rape, sodomy in the first degree,
140 forcible sodomy, assault in the second degree if the victim
141 of such assault is a special victim as defined in
142 subdivision (14) of section 565.002, kidnapping in the first
143 degree, kidnapping, murder in the second degree, assault of
144 a law enforcement officer in the first degree, domestic
145 assault in the first degree, elder abuse in the first
146 degree, robbery in the first degree, armed criminal action,
147 conspiracy to commit an offense when the offense is a
148 dangerous felony, vehicle hijacking when punished as a class
149 A felony, statutory rape in the first degree [when the
150 victim is a child less than twelve years of age at the time
151 of the commission of the act giving rise to the offense],
152 statutory sodomy in the first degree [when the victim is a
153 child less than twelve years of age at the time of the
154 commission of the act giving rise to the offense], child
155 molestation in the first or second degree, abuse of a child
156 if the child dies as a result of injuries sustained from

SB 1294 62
157 conduct chargeable under section 568.060, child kidnapping,
158 parental kidnapping committed by detaining or concealing the
159 whereabouts of the child for not less than one hundred
160 twenty days under section 565.153, bus hijacking when
161 punished as a class A felony, planting a bomb or explosive
162 in or near a bus or terminal, [and] an "intoxication-related
163 traffic offense" or "intoxication-related boating offense"
164 if the person is found to be a "habitual offender" or
165 "habitual boating offender" as such terms are defined in
166 section 577.001, trafficking for the purposes of slavery,
167 involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor or attempted
168 trafficking for the purposes of slavery, involuntary
169 servitude, peonage, or forced labor when punished as a class
170 A felony pursuant to section 566.206, trafficking for the
171 purposes of sexual exploitation or attempted trafficking for
172 the purposes of sexual exploitation when punished as a class
173 A felony pursuant to section 566.209, sexual trafficking of
174 a child in the first degree, sexual trafficking of a child
175 in the second degree, and the failure to register as a sex
176 offender as a third offense under section 589.425;
177 (20) "Dangerous instrument", any instrument, article
178 or substance, which, under the circumstances in which it is
179 used, is readily capable of causing death or other serious
180 physical injury;
181 (21) "Data", a representation of information, facts,
182 knowledge, concepts, or instructions prepared in a
183 formalized or other manner and intended for use in a
184 computer or computer network. Data may be in any form
185 including, but not limited to, printouts, microfiche,
186 magnetic storage media, punched cards and as may be stored
187 in the memory of a computer;

SB 1294 63
188 (22) "Deadly weapon", any firearm, loaded or unloaded,
189 or any weapon from which a shot, readily capable of
190 producing death or serious physical injury, may be
191 discharged, or a switchblade knife, dagger, billy club,
192 blackjack or metal knuckles;
193 (23) "Digital camera", a camera that records images in
194 a format which enables the images to be downloaded into a
195 computer;
196 (24) "Disability", a mental, physical, or
197 developmental impairment that substantially limits one or
198 more major life activities or the ability to provide
199 adequately for one's care or protection, whether the
200 impairment is congenital or acquired by accident, injury or
201 disease, where such impairment is verified by medical
202 findings;
203 (25) "Elderly person", a person sixty years of age or
204 older;
205 (26) "Felony", an offense so designated or an offense
206 for which persons found guilty thereof may be sentenced to
207 death or imprisonment for a term of more than one year;
208 (27) "Forcible compulsion" either:
209 (a) Physical force that overcomes reasonable
210 resistance; or
211 (b) A threat, express or implied, that places a person
212 in reasonable fear of death, serious physical injury or
213 kidnapping of such person or another person;
214 (28) "Incapacitated", a temporary or permanent
215 physical or mental condition in which a person is
216 unconscious, unable to appraise the nature of his or her
217 conduct, or unable to communicate unwillingness to an act;
218 (29) "Infraction", a violation defined by this code or
219 by any other statute of this state if it is so designated or

SB 1294 64
220 if no sentence other than a fine, or fine and forfeiture or
221 other civil penalty, is authorized upon conviction;
222 (30) "Inhabitable structure", a vehicle, vessel or
223 structure:
224 (a) Where any person lives or carries on business or
225 other calling; or
226 (b) Where people assemble for purposes of business,
227 government, education, religion, entertainment, or public
228 transportation; or
229 (c) Which is used for overnight accommodation of
230 persons.
231 Any such vehicle, vessel, or structure is inhabitable
232 regardless of whether a person is actually present. If a
233 building or structure is divided into separately occupied
234 units, any unit not occupied by the actor is an inhabitable
235 structure of another;
236 (31) "Knowingly", when used with respect to:
237 (a) Conduct or attendant circumstances, means a person
238 is aware of the nature of his or her conduct or that those
239 circumstances exist; or
240 (b) A result of conduct, means a person is aware that
241 his or her conduct is practically certain to cause that
242 result;
243 (32) "Law enforcement officer", any public servant
244 having both the power and duty to make arrests for
245 violations of the laws of this state, and federal law
246 enforcement officers authorized to carry firearms and to
247 make arrests for violations of the laws of the United States;
248 (33) "Misdemeanor", an offense so designated or an
249 offense for which persons found guilty thereof may be

SB 1294 65
250 sentenced to imprisonment for a term of which the maximum is
251 one year or less;
252 (34) "Of another", property that any entity, including
253 but not limited to any natural person, corporation, limited
254 liability company, partnership, association, governmental
255 subdivision or instrumentality, other than the actor, has a
256 possessory or proprietary interest therein, except that
257 property shall not be deemed property of another who has
258 only a security interest therein, even if legal title is in
259 the creditor pursuant to a conditional sales contract or
260 other security arrangement;
261 (35) "Offense", any felony or misdemeanor;
262 (36) "Physical injury", slight impairment of any
263 function of the body or temporary loss of use of any part of
264 the body;
265 (37) "Place of confinement", any building or facility
266 and the grounds thereof wherein a court is legally
267 authorized to order that a person charged with or convicted
268 of a crime be held;
269 (38) "Possess" or "possessed", having actual or
270 constructive possession of an object with knowledge of its
271 presence. A person has actual possession if such person has
272 the object on his or her person or within easy reach and
273 convenient control. A person has constructive possession if
274 such person has the power and the intention at a given time
275 to exercise dominion or control over the object either
276 directly or through another person or persons. Possession
277 may also be sole or joint. If one person alone has
278 possession of an object, possession is sole. If two or more
279 persons share possession of an object, possession is joint;
280 (39) "Property", anything of value, whether real or
281 personal, tangible or intangible, in possession or in action;

SB 1294 66
282 (40) "Public servant", any person employed in any way
283 by a government of this state who is compensated by the
284 government by reason of such person's employment, any person
285 appointed to a position with any government of this state,
286 or any person elected to a position with any government of
287 this state. It includes, but is not limited to,
288 legislators, jurors, members of the judiciary and law
289 enforcement officers. It does not include witnesses;
290 (41) "Purposely", when used with respect to a person's
291 conduct or to a result thereof, means when it is his or her
292 conscious object to engage in that conduct or to cause that
293 result;
294 (42) "Recklessly", consciously disregarding a
295 substantial and unjustifiable risk that circumstances exist
296 or that a result will follow, and such disregard constitutes
297 a gross deviation from the standard of care which a
298 reasonable person would exercise in the situation;
299 (43) "Serious emotional injury", an injury that
300 creates a substantial risk of temporary or permanent medical
301 or psychological damage, manifested by impairment of a
302 behavioral, cognitive or physical condition. Serious
303 emotional injury shall be established by testimony of
304 qualified experts upon the reasonable expectation of
305 probable harm to a reasonable degree of medical or
306 psychological certainty;
307 (44) "Serious physical injury", physical injury that
308 creates a substantial risk of death or that causes serious
309 disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the
310 function of any part of the body;
311 (45) "Services", when used in relation to a computer
312 system or network, means use of a computer, computer system,
313 or computer network and includes, but is not limited to,

SB 1294 67
314 computer time, data processing, and storage or retrieval
315 functions;
316 (46) "Sexual orientation", male or female
317 heterosexuality, homosexuality or bisexuality by
318 inclination, practice, identity or expression, or having a
319 self-image or identity not traditionally associated with
320 one's gender;
321 (47) "Vehicle", a self-propelled mechanical device
322 designed to carry a person or persons, excluding vessels or
323 aircraft;
324 (48) "Vessel", any boat or craft propelled by a motor
325 or by machinery, whether or not such motor or machinery is a
326 principal source of propulsion used or capable of being used
327 as a means of transportation on water, or any boat or craft
328 more than twelve feet in length which is powered by sail
329 alone or by a combination of sail and machinery, and used or
330 capable of being used as a means of transportation on water,
331 but not any boat or craft having, as the only means of
332 propulsion, a paddle or oars;
333 (49) "Voluntary act":
334 (a) A bodily movement performed while conscious as a
335 result of effort or determination. Possession is a
336 voluntary act if the possessor knowingly procures or
337 receives the thing possessed, or having acquired control of
338 it was aware of his or her control for a sufficient time to
339 have enabled him or her to dispose of it or terminate his or
340 her control; or
341 (b) An omission to perform an act of which the actor
342 is physically capable. A person is not guilty of an offense
343 based solely upon an omission to perform an act unless the
344 law defining the offense expressly so provides, or a duty to
345 perform the omitted act is otherwise imposed by law;

SB 1294 68
346 (50) "Vulnerable person", any person in the custody,
347 care, or control of the department of mental health who is
348 receiving services from an operated, funded, licensed, or
349 certified program.
557.011. 1. Every person found guilty of an offense
shall be dealt with by the court in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, except that for offenses defined
outside this code and not repealed, the term of imprisonment
or the fine that may be imposed is that provided in the
statute defining the offense[; however, the conditional
release term of any sentence of a term of years shall be
determined as provided in subsection 4 of section 558.011].
2. Whenever any person has been found guilty of a
felony or a misdemeanor the court shall make one or more of
the following dispositions of the offender in any
appropriate combination. The court may:
(1) Sentence the person to a term of imprisonment as
authorized by chapter 558;
(2) Sentence the person to pay a fine as authorized by
chapter 560;
(3) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or
without placing the person on probation;
(4) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution,
placing the person on probation;
(5) Impose a period of detention as a condition of
probation, as authorized by section 559.026.
3. Whenever any person has been found guilty of an
infraction, the court shall make one or more of the
following dispositions of the offender in any appropriate
combination. The court may:
(1) Sentence the person to pay a fine as authorized by
chapter 560;

SB 1294 69
(2) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or
without placing the person on probation;
(3) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution,
placing the person on probation.
4. Whenever any organization has been found guilty of
an offense, the court shall make one or more of the
following dispositions of the organization in any
appropriate combination. The court may:
(1) Sentence the organization to pay a fine as
authorized by chapter 560;
(2) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or
without placing the organization on probation;
(3) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution,
placing the organization on probation;
(4) Impose any special sentence or sanction authorized
by law.
5. This chapter shall not be construed to deprive the
court of any authority conferred by law to decree a
forfeiture of property, suspend or cancel a license, remove
a person from office, or impose any other civil penalty. An
appropriate order exercising such authority may be included
as part of any sentence.
6. In the event a sentence of confinement is ordered
executed, a court may order that an individual serve all or
any portion of such sentence on electronic monitoring;
except that all costs associated with the electronic
monitoring shall be charged to the person on house arrest.
If the judge finds the person unable to afford the costs
associated with electronic monitoring, the judge may order
that the person be placed on house arrest with electronic
monitoring if the county commission agrees to pay the costs
of such monitoring. If the person on house arrest is unable

SB 1294 70
to afford the costs associated with electronic monitoring
and the county commission does not agree to pay from the
general revenue of the county the costs of such electronic
monitoring, the judge shall not order that the person be
placed on house arrest with electronic monitoring.
557.021. 1. Any offense defined outside this code
which is declared to be a misdemeanor without specification
of the penalty therefor is a class A misdemeanor.
2. Any offense defined outside this code which is
declared to be a felony without specification of the penalty
therefor is a class E felony and subject to the terms
outlined in chapter 558.
3. For the purpose of applying the extended term
provisions of section 558.016 and the minimum prison term
provisions of section [558.019] 558.011 and for determining
the penalty for attempts, offenses defined outside of this
code shall be classified as follows:
(1) If the offense is a felony:
(a) It is a class A felony if the authorized penalty
includes death, life imprisonment or imprisonment for a term
of twenty years or more;
(b) It is a class B felony if the maximum term of
imprisonment authorized exceeds ten years but is less than
twenty years;
(c) It is a class C felony if the maximum term of
imprisonment authorized is ten years;
(d) It is a class D felony if the maximum term of
imprisonment exceeds four years but is less than ten years;
(e) It is a class E felony if the maximum term of
imprisonment is four years or less;
(2) If the offense is a misdemeanor:

SB 1294 71
(a) It is a class A misdemeanor if the authorized
imprisonment exceeds six months in jail;
(b) It is a class B misdemeanor if the authorized
imprisonment exceeds thirty days but is not more than six
months;
(c) It is a class C misdemeanor if the authorized
imprisonment is thirty days or less;
(d) It is a class D misdemeanor if it includes a
mental state as an element of the offense and there is no
authorized imprisonment;
(e) It is an infraction if there is no authorized
imprisonment.
558.011. 1. The authorized terms of imprisonment[,
including both prison and conditional release terms,] for
all felony offenses are:
(1) For a class A felony, a term of years not less
than ten years and not to exceed thirty years, or life
imprisonment, for which an offender shall serve a minimum
percentage between sixty to eighty percent of the imposed
sentence, as determined by the sentencing court, prior to
parole eligibility;
(2) For a class B felony, a term of years not less
than five years and not to exceed fifteen years, for which
an offender shall serve a minimum percentage between forty
and sixty percent of the imposed sentence, as determined by
the sentencing court, prior to parole eligibility;
(3) For a class C felony, a term of years not less
than three years and not to exceed ten years, for which an
offender shall serve a minimum percentage between thirty and
fifty percent of the imposed sentence, as determined by the
sentencing court, prior to parole eligibility;

SB 1294 72
(4) For a class D felony, a term of years not to
exceed seven years, for which an offender shall serve a
minimum percentage between seventeen and thirty-seven
percent of the imposed sentence, as determined by the
sentencing court, prior to parole eligibility;
(5) For a class E felony, a term of years not to
exceed four years, for which an offender shall serve a
minimum percentage between seventeen and thirty-seven
percent of the imposed sentence, as determined by the
sentencing court, prior to parole eligibility;
(6) For a class A misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
one year;
(7) For a class B misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
six months;
(8) For a class C misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
fifteen days.
2. The authorized terms of imprisonment provided in
subsection 1 of this section shall apply to all offenses
within this code, excluding those categorized as dangerous
felonies, as such term is defined in section 556.061.
3. In cases where the sentencing court does not impose
a specific term of imprisonment required to be served in
order for the person to become parole eligible, the minimum
percentage of the term of imprisonment associated with the
felony class for which the offender is being sentenced shall
be the required term of imprisonment.
4. In cases of class D and E felonies, the court shall
have discretion to imprison for a special term not to exceed
one year in the county jail or other authorized penal
institution, and the place of confinement shall be fixed by
the court. If the court imposes a sentence of imprisonment
for a term longer than one year upon a person convicted of a

SB 1294 73
class D or E felony, it shall commit the person to the
custody of the department of corrections.
[3.] 5. (1) When a regular sentence of imprisonment
for a felony is imposed, the court shall commit the person
to the custody of the department of corrections for the term
imposed under section 557.036, or until released under
procedures established elsewhere by law.
(2) A sentence of imprisonment for a misdemeanor shall
be for a definite term and the court shall commit the person
to the county jail or other authorized penal institution for
the term of his or her sentence or until released under
procedure established elsewhere by law.
[4. (1) Except as otherwise provided, a sentence of
imprisonment for a term of years for felonies other than
dangerous felonies as defined in section 556.061, and other
than sentences of imprisonment which involve the
individual's fourth or subsequent remand to the department
of corrections shall consist of a prison term and a
conditional release term. The conditional release term of
any term imposed under section 557.036 shall be:
(a) One-third for terms of nine years or less;
(b) Three years for terms between nine and fifteen
years;
(c) Five years for terms more than fifteen years; and
the prison term shall be the remainder of such term. The
prison term may be extended by the parole board pursuant to
subsection 5 of this section.
(2) "Conditional release" means the conditional
discharge of an offender by the parole board, subject to
conditions of release that the parole board deems reasonable
to assist the offender to lead a law-abiding life, and
subject to the supervision under the division of probation

SB 1294 74
and parole. The conditions of release shall include
avoidance by the offender of any other offense, federal or
state, and other conditions that the parole board in its
discretion deems reasonably necessary to assist the releasee
in avoiding further violation of the law.
5. The date of conditional release from the prison
term may be extended up to a maximum of the entire sentence
of imprisonment by the parole board. The director of any
division of the department of corrections except the
division of probation and parole may file with the parole
board a petition to extend the conditional release date when
an offender fails to follow the rules and regulations of the
division or commits an act in violation of such rules.
Within ten working days of receipt of the petition to extend
the conditional release date, the parole board shall convene
a hearing on the petition. The offender shall be present
100 and may call witnesses in his or her behalf and cross-
101 examine witnesses appearing against the offender. The
102 hearing shall be conducted as provided in section 217.670.
103 If the violation occurs in close proximity to the
104 conditional release date, the conditional release may be
105 held for a maximum of fifteen working days to permit
106 necessary time for the division director to file a petition
107 for an extension with the parole board and for the parole
108 board to conduct a hearing, provided some affirmative
109 manifestation of an intent to extend the conditional release
110 has occurred prior to the conditional release date. If at
111 the end of a fifteen-working-day period a parole board
112 decision has not been reached, the offender shall be
113 released conditionally. The decision of the parole board
114 shall be final.]

SB 1294 75
115 6. This section shall not be construed to affect the
116 powers of the governor under Section 7 of Article IV of the
117 Constitution of Missouri. This section shall not affect
118 those provisions of section 565.020 or 566.125, which set
119 minimum terms of sentences, or the provisions of section
120 559.115 relating to probation.
121 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
122 contrary, any offender who has been found guilty of a
123 dangerous felony and is committed to the department of
124 corrections shall be required to serve a minimum prison term
125 of eighty-five percent of the sentence imposed by the
126 sentencing court.
127 8. For the purpose of determining the minimum prison
128 term to be served, the following calculations shall apply:
129 (1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be
130 thirty years;
131 (2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with
132 other consecutive sentences for offenses committed at or
133 near the same time which is over seventy-five years shall be
134 calculated to be seventy-five years.
135 9. For purposes of this section, the term "minimum
136 prison term" shall mean time required to be served by the
137 offender before he or she is eligible for parole or other
138 early release by the department of corrections.
558.019. 1. [This section shall not be construed to
affect the powers of the governor under Article IV, Section
7, of the Missouri Constitution. This statute shall not
affect those provisions of section 565.020 or section
566.125, which set minimum terms of sentences, or the
provisions of section 559.115, relating to probation.
2. The provisions of subsections 2 to 5 of this
section shall only be applicable to the offenses contained

SB 1294 76
in sections 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, 565.027, 565.050,
565.052, 565.054, 565.072, 565.073, 565.074, 565.090,
565.110, 565.115, 565.120, 565.153, 565.156, 565.225,
565.300, 566.030, 566.031, 566.032, 566.034, 566.060,
566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067, 566.068, 566.069,
566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.100, 566.101, 566.103,
566.111, 566.115, 566.145, 566.151, 566.153, 566.203,
566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 566.215, 568.030,
568.045, 568.060, 568.065, 568.175, 569.040, 569.160,
570.023, 570.025, 570.030 when punished as a class A, B, or
C felony, 570.145 when punished as a class A or B felony,
570.223 when punished as a class B or C felony, 571.020,
571.030, 571.070, 573.023, 573.025, 573.035, 573.037,
573.200, 573.205, 574.070, 574.080, 574.115, 575.030,
575.150, 575.153, 575.155, 575.157, 575.200 when punished as
a class A felony, 575.210, 575.230 when punished as a class
B felony, 575.240 when punished as a class B felony,
576.070, 576.080, 577.010, 577.013, 577.078, 577.703,
577.706, 579.065, and 579.068 when punished as a class A or
B felony. For the purposes of this section, "prison
commitment" means and is the receipt by the department of
corrections of an offender after sentencing. For purposes
of this section, prior prison commitments to the department
of corrections shall not include an offender's first
incarceration prior to release on probation under section
217.362 or 559.115. Other provisions of the law to the
contrary notwithstanding, any offender who has been found
guilty of a felony other than a dangerous felony as defined
in section 556.061 and is committed to the department of
corrections shall be required to serve the following minimum
prison terms:

SB 1294 77
(1) If the offender has one previous prison commitment
to the department of corrections for a felony offense, the
minimum prison term which the offender must serve shall be
forty percent of his or her sentence or until the offender
attains seventy years of age, and has served at least thirty
percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first;
(2) If the offender has two previous prison
commitments to the department of corrections for felonies
unrelated to the present offense, the minimum prison term
which the offender must serve shall be fifty percent of his
or her sentence or until the offender attains seventy years
of age, and has served at least forty percent of the
sentence imposed, whichever occurs first;
(3) If the offender has three or more previous prison
commitments to the department of corrections for felonies
unrelated to the present offense, the minimum prison term
which the offender must serve shall be eighty percent of his
or her sentence or until the offender attains seventy years
of age, and has served at least forty percent of the
sentence imposed, whichever occurs first.
3. Other provisions of the law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any offender who has been found guilty of a
dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and is
committed to the department of corrections shall be required
to serve a minimum prison term of eighty-five percent of the
sentence imposed by the court or until the offender attains
seventy years of age, and has served at least forty percent
of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first.
4. For the purpose of determining the minimum prison
term to be served, the following calculations shall apply:
(1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be
thirty years;

SB 1294 78
(2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with
other consecutive sentences for offenses committed at or
near the same time which is over seventy-five years shall be
calculated to be seventy-five years.
5. For purposes of this section, the term "minimum
prison term" shall mean time required to be served by the
offender before he or she is eligible for parole,
conditional release or other early release by the department
of corrections.
6. An offender who was convicted of, or pled guilty
to, a felony offense other than those offenses listed in
subsection 2 of this section prior to August 28, 2019, shall
no longer be subject to the minimum prison term provisions
under subsection 2 of this section, and shall be eligible
for parole, conditional release, or other early release by
the department of corrections according to the rules and
regulations of the department.
7.] (1) A sentencing advisory commission is hereby
created to consist of eleven members. One member shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house. One member shall be
appointed by the president pro tem of the senate. One
member shall be the director of the department of
corrections. Six members shall be appointed by and serve at
the pleasure of the governor from among the following: the
public defender commission; private citizens; a private
member of the Missouri Bar; the board of probation and
parole; and a prosecutor. Two members shall be appointed by
the supreme court, one from a metropolitan area and one from
100 a rural area. All members shall be appointed to a four-year
101 term. All members of the sentencing commission appointed
102 prior to August 28, 1994, shall continue to serve on the

SB 1294 79
103 sentencing advisory commission at the pleasure of the
104 governor.
105 (2) The commission shall study sentencing practices in
106 the circuit courts throughout the state for the purpose of
107 determining whether and to what extent disparities exist
108 among the various circuit courts with respect to the length
109 of sentences imposed and the use of probation for offenders
110 convicted of the same or similar offenses and with similar
111 criminal histories. The commission shall also study and
112 examine whether and to what extent sentencing disparity
113 among economic and social classes exists in relation to the
114 sentence of death and if so, the reasons therefor, if
115 sentences are comparable to other states, if the length of
116 the sentence is appropriate, and the rate of rehabilitation
117 based on sentence. It shall compile statistics, examine
118 cases, draw conclusions, and perform other duties relevant
119 to the research and investigation of disparities in death
120 penalty sentencing among economic and social classes.
121 (3) The commission shall study alternative sentences,
122 prison work programs, work release, home-based
123 incarceration, probation and parole options, and any other
124 programs and report the feasibility of these options in
125 Missouri.
126 (4) The governor shall select a chairperson who shall
127 call meetings of the commission as required or permitted
128 pursuant to the purpose of the sentencing commission.
129 (5) The members of the commission shall not receive
130 compensation for their duties on the commission, but shall
131 be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in
132 the performance of these duties and for which they are not
133 reimbursed by reason of their other paid positions.

SB 1294 80
134 (6) The circuit and associate circuit courts of this
135 state, the office of the state courts administrator, the
136 department of public safety, and the department of
137 corrections shall cooperate with the commission by providing
138 information or access to information needed by the
139 commission. The office of the state courts administrator
140 will provide needed staffing resources.
141 [8.] 2. Courts shall retain discretion to lower or
142 exceed the sentence recommended by the commission as
143 otherwise allowable by law, and to order restorative justice
144 methods, when applicable.
145 [9.] 3. If the imposition or execution of a sentence
146 is suspended, the court may order any or all of the
147 following restorative justice methods, or any other method
148 that the court finds just or appropriate:
149 (1) Restitution to any victim or a statutorily created
150 fund for costs incurred as a result of the offender's
151 actions;
152 (2) Offender treatment programs;
153 (3) Mandatory community service;
154 (4) Work release programs in local facilities; and
155 (5) Community-based residential and nonresidential
156 programs.
157 [10.] 4. Pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection [9]
158 1 of this section, the court may order the assessment and
159 payment of a designated amount of restitution to a county
160 law enforcement restitution fund established by the county
161 commission pursuant to section 50.565. Such contribution
162 shall not exceed three hundred dollars for any charged
163 offense. Any restitution moneys deposited into the county
164 law enforcement restitution fund pursuant to this section

SB 1294 81
165 shall only be expended pursuant to the provisions of section
166 50.565.
167 [11.] 5. A judge may order payment to a restitution
168 fund only if such fund had been created by ordinance or
169 resolution of a county of the state of Missouri prior to
170 sentencing. A judge shall not have any direct supervisory
171 authority or administrative control over any fund to which
172 the judge is ordering a person to make payment.
173 [12.] 6. A person who fails to make a payment to a
174 county law enforcement restitution fund may not have his or
175 her probation revoked solely for failing to make such
176 payment unless the judge, after evidentiary hearing, makes a
177 finding supported by a preponderance of the evidence that
178 the person either willfully refused to make the payment or
179 that the person willfully, intentionally, and purposefully
180 failed to make sufficient bona fide efforts to acquire the
181 resources to pay.
182 [13.] 7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
183 allow the sentencing advisory commission to issue
184 recommended sentences in specific cases pending in the
185 courts of this state.
558.026. 1. Multiple sentences of imprisonment shall
run concurrently unless the court specifies that they shall
run consecutively; except in the case of multiple sentences
of imprisonment imposed for any offense committed during or
at the same time as, or multiple offenses of, the following
felonies:
(1) Rape in the first degree, forcible rape, or rape;
(2) Statutory rape in the first degree;
(3) Sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, or
sodomy;
(4) Statutory sodomy in the first degree; or

SB 1294 82
(5) An attempt to commit any of the felonies listed in
this subsection. In such case, the sentence of imprisonment
imposed for any felony listed in this subsection or an
attempt to commit any of the aforesaid shall run
consecutively to the other sentences. The sentences imposed
for any other offense may run concurrently.
2. If a person who is on probation[,] or parole [or
conditional release] is sentenced to a term of imprisonment
for an offense committed after the granting of probation or
parole [or after the start of his or her conditional release
term], the court shall direct the manner in which the
sentence or sentences imposed by the court shall run with
respect to any resulting probation, parole or conditional
release revocation term or terms. If the subsequent
sentence to imprisonment is in another jurisdiction, the
court shall specify how any resulting probation, parole or
conditional release revocation term or terms shall run with
respect to the foreign sentence of imprisonment.
3. A court may cause any sentence it imposes to run
concurrently with a sentence an individual is serving or is
to serve in another state or in a federal correctional
center. If the Missouri sentence is served in another state
or in a federal correctional center, [subsection 4 of
section 558.011 and] section 217.690 shall apply as if the
individual were serving his or her sentence within the
department of corrections of the state of Missouri, except
that a personal hearing before the parole board shall not be
required for parole consideration.
4. When consecutive sentences are imposed by a court,
the sentencing equation shall be calculated using the
imposed term of years with respect to the minimum percentage

SB 1294 83
of the term authorized by the judge that shall be required
to be served prior to parole eligibility.
(1) For each felony offense of the consecutive
sentences to be served, the sentencing court shall impose
half of the term of years for each felony offense to be
served in prison prior to parole eligibility.
(2) For consecutive sentencing, the sentencing court
shall add half of the total number of years together from
each of the included felony offenses to be run consecutively
to determine the total number of years required to be served
prior to parole eligibility.
5. When concurrent sentences are imposed by a court, a
person shall serve the minimum required percentage for each
offense prior to parole eligibility.
558.031. 1. A sentence of imprisonment shall commence
when a person convicted of an offense in this state is
received into the custody of the department of corrections
or other place of confinement where the offender is
sentenced.
2. [Such] The court shall, when pronouncing a
sentence, executing a suspended sentence, or suspending the
imposition of a sentence, record, as part of the judgment,
the number of days the person [shall receive credit toward
the service of a sentence of imprisonment for all time] was
in prison, jail, or custody, which was related to the
offense, after the offense occurred and before the
[commencement] pronouncement of the sentence[, when the time
in custody was related to that offense] or suspension of
imposition of the sentence, and award credit towards the
service of a sentence of imprisonment for that number of
days. [This] The jail time credit calculation shall be
[based upon the certification of the sheriff as provided in

SB 1294 84
subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of section 217.305 and may
be supplemented by a certificate of a sheriff or other
custodial officer from another jurisdiction having held the
person on the charge of the offense for which the sentence
of imprisonment is ordered] pronounced at the time of the
judgment, the execution of a suspended sentence, or the
suspension of imposition of sentence, shall be included in
the record, and shall include both the dates the person was
in custody and the number of days to be credited toward the
service of the sentence.
3. For purposes of this section, time in custody
related to an offense includes time during which the offense
was charged in a criminal proceeding, there was an arrest
warrant issued in said criminal proceeding, and the arrest
warrant was served upon the person. The person shall not be
entitled to any credit toward the service of a sentence of
imprisonment for any time such person was not being held on
said arrest warrant because such person posted bond, the
arrest warrant was recalled, or the person was otherwise
released.
4. The court may take judicial notice of all time the
person has served in prison, jail, or custody for a criminal
proceeding by comparing dates of service on arrest warrants
with evidence contained within the court file of dates of
release and the prosecution and defense attorney may enter
into a stipulation with regard to credit for the service of
a sentence of imprisonment for all time in prison, jail, or
custody, except in no event may the court approve a
stipulation that is greater than or less than the time in
custody related to an offense.
5. Upon motion and notice by defendant or defense
counsel, for any such person who was held in a juvenile

SB 1294 85
detention facility for an offense for which such person was
subsequently adjudicated to stand trial as an adult, the
court may also award credit toward the service of a sentence
of imprisonment for any time such person was confined in a
juvenile detention facility.
6. In the event a criminal proceeding related to an
offense is dismissed without prejudice by a court or nolle
prossed by the state, upon motion and notice by defendant or
defense counsel, the proceeding may be consolidated into the
present matter for purposes of calculating credit for the
service of a sentence of imprisonment.
7. The officer required by law to deliver a person
convicted of an offense in this state to the department of
corrections shall endorse upon the papers required by
section 217.305 both the dates the offender was in custody
and the period of time to be credited toward the service of
the sentence of imprisonment[, except as endorsed by such
officer] included in the judgment or suspended imposition of
sentence and such additional days after the pronouncement of
sentence and before the delivery of the person to the
department of corrections.
[4.] 8. If a person convicted of an offense escapes
from custody, such escape shall interrupt the sentence. The
interruption shall continue until such person is returned to
the correctional center where the sentence was being served,
or in the case of a person committed to the custody of the
department of corrections, to any correctional center
operated by the department of corrections. An escape shall
also interrupt the jail time credit to be applied to a
sentence which had not commenced when the escape occurred.
[5.] 9. If a sentence of imprisonment is vacated and a
new sentence imposed upon the offender for that offense, all

SB 1294 86
time served under the vacated sentence shall be credited
against the new sentence, unless the time has already been
credited to another sentence as provided in subsection 1 of
this section.
[6.] 10. If a person released from imprisonment on
parole or serving a conditional release term violates any of
the conditions of his or her parole or release, he or she
may be treated as a parole violator. If the parole board
revokes the parole or conditional release, the paroled
person shall serve the remainder of the prison term and
conditional release term, as an additional prison term, and
the conditionally released person shall serve the remainder
of the conditional release term as a prison term, unless
released on parole.
[7.] 11. Subsection 2 of this section shall be
applicable to offenses for which the offender was sentenced
on or after August 28, [2023] 2026.
100 [8. The total amount of credit given shall not exceed
101 the number of days spent in prison, jail, or custody after
102 the offense occurred and before the commencement of the
103 sentence.]
104 12. The court shall retain jurisdiction to rule on any
105 motion challenging the number of days of jail time credit
106 awarded in the pronouncement of a sentence.
558.046. The sentencing court may, upon petition,
reduce any term of sentence or probation pronounced by the
court or a term of conditional release or parole pronounced
by the parole board if the court determines that:
(1) The convicted person was:
(a) Convicted of an offense that did not involve
violence or the threat of violence; and

SB 1294 87
(b) Convicted of an offense that involved alcohol or
illegal drugs; and
(2) Since the commission of such offense, the
convicted person has successfully completed a detoxification
and rehabilitation program; and
(3) The convicted person is not:
(a) A prior offender, a persistent offender, a
dangerous offender or a persistent misdemeanor offender as
defined by section 558.016; or
(b) A persistent sexual offender as defined in section
566.125[; or
(c) A prior offender, a persistent offender or a class
X offender as defined in section 558.019].
559.115. 1. Neither probation nor parole shall be
granted by the circuit court between the time the transcript
on appeal from the offender's conviction has been filed in
appellate court and the disposition of the appeal by such
court.
2. Unless otherwise prohibited by subsection [8] 7 of
this section, a circuit court only upon its own motion and
not that of the state or the offender shall have the power
to grant probation to an offender anytime up to one hundred
twenty days after such offender has been delivered to the
department of corrections but not thereafter. The court may
request information and a recommendation from the department
concerning the offender and such offender's behavior during
the period of incarceration. Except as provided in this
section, the court may place the offender on probation in a
program created pursuant to section 217.777, or may place
the offender on probation with any other conditions
authorized by law.

SB 1294 88
3. The court may recommend placement of an offender in
a department of corrections one hundred twenty-day program
under this subsection. The department of corrections shall
assess each offender to determine the appropriate one
hundred twenty-day program in which to place the offender,
which may include placement in the structured cognitive
behavioral intervention program or institutional treatment
program. The placement of an offender in the structured
cognitive behavioral intervention program or institutional
treatment program shall be at the sole discretion of the
department based on the assessment of the offender and
available bed space. When the court recommends and receives
placement of an offender in a department of corrections one
hundred twenty-day program, the offender shall be released
on probation if the department of corrections determines
that the offender has successfully completed the program
except as follows. Upon successful completion of a program
under this subsection, the division of probation and parole
shall advise the sentencing court of an offender's
probationary release date thirty days prior to release. The
court shall follow the recommendation of the department
unless the court determines that probation is not
appropriate. If the court determines that probation is not
appropriate, the court may order the execution of the
offender's sentence only after conducting a hearing on the
matter within ninety to one hundred twenty days from the
date the offender was delivered to the department of
corrections. If the department determines the offender has
not successfully completed a one hundred twenty-day program
under this subsection, the division of probation and parole
shall advise the prosecuting attorney and the sentencing
court of the defendant's unsuccessful program exit and the

SB 1294 89
defendant shall be removed from the program. The department
shall report on the offender's participation in the program
and may provide recommendations for terms and conditions of
an offender's probation. The court shall then have the
power to grant probation or order the execution of the
offender's sentence.
4. If the court is advised that an offender is not
eligible for placement in a one hundred twenty-day program
under subsection 3 of this section, the court shall consider
other authorized dispositions. If the department of
corrections one hundred twenty-day program under subsection
3 of this section is full, the court may place the offender
in a private program approved by the department of
corrections or the court, the expenses of such program to be
paid by the offender, or in an available program offered by
another organization. If the offender is convicted of a
class C, class D, or class E nonviolent felony, the court
may order probation while awaiting appointment to treatment.
5. Except when the offender has been found to be a
predatory sexual offender pursuant to section 566.125, the
court shall request the department of corrections to conduct
a sexual offender assessment if the defendant has been found
guilty of sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony.
Upon completion of the assessment, the department shall
provide to the court a report on the offender and may
provide recommendations for terms and conditions of an
offender's probation. The assessment shall not be
considered a one hundred twenty-day program as provided
under subsection 3 of this section. The process for
granting probation to an offender who has completed the
assessment shall be as provided under subsections 2 and 6 of
this section.

SB 1294 90
6. Unless the offender is being granted probation
pursuant to successful completion of a one hundred twenty-
day program the circuit court shall notify the state in
writing when the court intends to grant probation to the
offender pursuant to the provisions of this section. The
state may, in writing, request a hearing within ten days of
receipt of the court's notification that the court intends
to grant probation. Upon the state's request for a hearing,
the court shall grant a hearing as soon as reasonably
possible. If the state does not respond to the court's
notice in writing within ten days, the court may proceed
upon its own motion to grant probation.
7. [An offender's first incarceration under this
section prior to release on probation shall not be
considered a previous prison commitment for the purpose of
determining a minimum prison term under the provisions of
section 558.019.
100 8.] Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
101 probation may not be granted pursuant to this section to
102 offenders who have been convicted of murder in the second
103 degree pursuant to section 565.021; forcible rape pursuant
104 to section 566.030 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013;
105 rape in the first degree under section 566.030; forcible
106 sodomy pursuant to section 566.060 as it existed prior to
107 August 28, 2013; sodomy in the first degree under section
108 566.060; statutory rape in the first degree pursuant to
109 section 566.032; statutory sodomy in the first degree
110 pursuant to section 566.062; child molestation in the first
111 degree pursuant to section 566.067 when classified as a
112 class A felony; abuse of a child pursuant to section 568.060
113 when classified as a class A felony; or an offender who has
114 been found to be a predatory sexual offender pursuant to

SB 1294 91
115 section 566.125; any offense under section 557.045; or any
116 offense in which there exists a statutory prohibition
117 against either probation or parole.
566.030. 1. A person commits the offense of rape in
the first degree if he or she has sexual intercourse with
another person who is incapacitated, incapable of consent,
or lacks the capacity to consent, or by the use of forcible
compulsion. Forcible compulsion includes the use of a
substance administered without a victim's knowledge or
consent which renders the victim physically or mentally
impaired so as to be incapable of making an informed consent
to sexual intercourse.
2. The offense of rape in the first degree or an
attempt to commit rape in the first degree is a class A
felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
imprisonment or a term of years not less than [five] ten
years[,] and not more than thirty years, unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in
which case the authorized term of imprisonment is life
imprisonment as described in section 558.011 or [a term of
years not less than fifteen years] life imprisonment without
eligibility for probation or parole;
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual
offender as defined in section 566.125 and subjected to an
extended term of imprisonment under said section;
(3) The victim is a child less than [twelve] fourteen
years of age, in which case the required term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment as described in section
558.011 or life imprisonment without eligibility for
probation or parole [until the offender has served not less
than thirty years of such sentence or unless the offender
has reached the age of seventy-five years and has served at

SB 1294 92
least fifteen years of such sentence, unless such rape in
the first degree is described under subdivision (4) of this
subsection]; or
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of
age and such rape in the first degree or attempt to commit
rape in the first degree was outrageously or wantonly vile,
horrible or inhumane, in that it involved torture or
depravity of mind, in which case the required term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for
probation[,] or parole [or conditional release].
3. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to
the sentence of a person who has been found guilty of rape
in the first degree or attempt to commit rape in the first
degree when the victim is less than twelve years of age, and
"life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for the duration
of a person's natural life for the purposes of this section.
4.] No person found guilty of rape in the first degree
or an attempt to commit rape in the first degree shall be
granted a suspended imposition of sentence or suspended
execution of sentence.
566.032. 1. A person commits the offense of statutory
rape in the first degree if he or she has sexual intercourse
with another person who is less than fourteen years of age.
2. The offense of statutory rape in the first degree
or an attempt to commit statutory rape in the first degree
is a class A felony for which the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term of years not
less than [five] ten years and not more than thirty years,
unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, or
the victim is less than twelve years of age in which case

SB 1294 93
the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or
a term of years not less than ten years; or
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual
offender as defined in section 566.125 and subjected to an
extended term of imprisonment under said section.
566.060. 1. A person commits the offense of sodomy in
the first degree if he or she has deviate sexual intercourse
with another person who is incapacitated, incapable of
consent, or lacks the capacity to consent, or by the use of
forcible compulsion. Forcible compulsion includes the use
of a substance administered without a victim's knowledge or
consent which renders the victim physically or mentally
impaired so as to be incapable of making an informed consent
to sexual intercourse.
2. The offense of sodomy in the first degree or an
attempt to commit sodomy in the first degree is a class B
felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
imprisonment or a term of years not less than five years and
not more than fifteen years, unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in
which case the offense is a class A felony for which the
authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or a
term of years not less than ten years;
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual
offender as defined in section 566.125 and subjected to an
extended term of imprisonment under said section;
(3) The victim is a child less than twelve years of
age, in which case the offense is a class A felony for which
the required term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or
life imprisonment without eligibility for probation or
parole [until the offender has served not less than thirty
years of such sentence or unless the offender has reached

SB 1294 94
the age of seventy-five years and has served at least
fifteen years of such sentence, unless such sodomy in the
first degree is described under subdivision (4) of this
subsection]; or
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of
age and such sodomy in the first degree or attempt to commit
sodomy in the first degree was outrageously or wantonly
vile, horrible or inhumane, in that it involved torture or
depravity of mind, in which case the required term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for
probation[,] or parole [or conditional release].
3. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to
the sentence of a person who has been found guilty of sodomy
in the first degree or an attempt to commit sodomy in the
first degree when the victim is less than twelve years of
age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for the
duration of a person's natural life for the purposes of this
section.
4.] No person found guilty of sodomy in the first
degree or an attempt to commit sodomy in the first degree
shall be granted a suspended imposition of sentence or
suspended execution of sentence.
566.062. 1. A person commits the offense of statutory
sodomy in the first degree if he or she has deviate sexual
intercourse with another person who is less than fourteen
years of age.
2. The offense of statutory sodomy in the first degree
or an attempt to commit statutory sodomy in the first degree
is a class B felony for which the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term of years not
less than five years and not more than fifteen years, unless:

SB 1294 95
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense or the
victim is less than twelve years of age, in which case the
offense shall be considered a class A felony for which the
authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or a
term of years not less than ten years; or
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual
offender as defined in section 566.125 and subjected to an
extended term of imprisonment under said section.
566.067. 1. A person commits the offense of child
molestation in the first degree if he or she subjects
another person who is less than fourteen years of age to
sexual contact and the offense is an aggravated sexual
offense.
2. The offense of child molestation in the first
degree is a class A felony and subject to a term of
imprisonment not less than ten years and not more than
thirty years, if the victim is a child less than twelve
years of age, the person shall serve his or her term of
imprisonment without eligibility for probation[,] or
parole[, or conditional release].
566.103. 1. A person or entity commits the offense of
promoting online sexual solicitation if such person or
entity knowingly permits a web-based classified service
owned or operated by such person or entity to be used by
individuals to post advertisements promoting prostitution,
enticing a child to engage in sexual conduct, or promoting
sexual trafficking of a child after receiving notice under
this section.
2. As used in this section, the term "web-based
classified service" means a person or entity in whose name a
specific URL or internet domain name is registered which has

SB 1294 96
advertisements for goods and services or personal
advertisements.
3. An advertisement may be deemed to promote
prostitution, entice a child to engage in sexual conduct, or
promote sexual trafficking of a child, if the content of
such advertisement would be interpreted by a reasonable
person as offering to exchange sexual conduct for goods or
services in violation of chapter 567, as seeking a child for
the purpose of sexual conduct or commercial sex act, or as
offering a child as a participant in sexual conduct or
commercial sex act in violation of section 566.151, 566.210,
or 566.211.
4. It shall be prima facie evidence that a person or
entity acts knowingly if an advertisement is not removed
from the web-based classified service within seventy-two
hours of that person or entity being notified that an
advertisement has been posted on that service which is
prohibited under this section.
5. Notice under this section may be provided by
certified mail or facsimile transmission by the attorney
general or any prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney.
6. A violation of this section shall be a class E
felony, [punishable by] where the authorized term of
imprisonment shall not exceed four years. A person may, in
addition to a term of imprisonment, be assessed a fine in
the amount of five thousand dollars per day that the
advertisement remains posted on the web-based classified
service after seventy-two hours of when notice has been
provided pursuant to this section.
7. Original jurisdiction for prosecution of a
violation of this section shall be with the local
prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney.

SB 1294 97
566.125. 1. The court shall sentence a person to an
extended term of imprisonment if it finds the defendant is a
persistent sexual offender and has been found guilty of
attempting to commit or committing the following offenses:
(1) Statutory rape in the first degree or statutory
sodomy in the first degree;
(2) Rape in the first degree or sodomy in the first
degree;
(3) Forcible rape;
(4) Forcible sodomy;
(5) Rape;
(6) Sodomy.
2. A "persistent sexual offender" is one who has
previously been found guilty of attempting to commit or
committing any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of
this section or one who has previously been found guilty of
an offense in any other jurisdiction which would constitute
any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section.
3. The term of imprisonment for one found to be a
persistent sexual offender shall be imprisonment for life
without eligibility for probation or parole. Subsection [4]
8 of section [558.019] 558.011 shall not apply to any person
imprisoned under this subsection, and "imprisonment for
life" shall mean imprisonment for the duration of the
person's natural life.
4. The court shall sentence a person to an extended
term of imprisonment as provided for in this section if it
finds the defendant is a predatory sexual offender and has
been found guilty of committing or attempting to commit any
of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section or
committing child molestation in the first or second degree
or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony.

SB 1294 98
5. For purposes of this section, a "predatory sexual
offender" is a person who:
(1) Has previously been found guilty of committing or
attempting to commit any of the offenses listed in
subsection 1 of this section, or committing child
molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse
when classified as a class B felony; or
(2) Has previously committed an act which would
constitute an offense listed in subsection 4 of this
section, whether or not the act resulted in a conviction; or
(3) Has committed an act or acts against more than one
victim which would constitute an offense or offenses listed
in subsection 4 of this section, whether or not the
defendant was charged with an additional offense or offenses
as a result of such act or acts.
6. A person found to be a predatory sexual offender
shall be imprisoned for life with eligibility for parole,
however subsection [4] 8 of section [558.019] 558.011 shall
not apply to persons found to be predatory sexual offenders
for the purposes of determining the minimum prison term or
the length of sentence as defined or used in such
subsection. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in
no event shall a person found to be a predatory sexual
offender receive a final discharge from parole.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
court shall set the minimum time required to be served
before a predatory sexual offender is eligible for parole,
conditional release or other early release by the department
of corrections. The minimum time to be served by a person
found to be a predatory sexual offender who:
(1) Has previously been found guilty of committing or
attempting to commit any of the offenses listed in

SB 1294 99
subsection 1 of this section and is found guilty of
committing or attempting to commit any of the offenses
listed in subsection 1 of this section shall be any number
of years but not less than thirty years;
(2) Has previously been found guilty of child
molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse
when classified as a class B felony and is found guilty of
attempting to commit or committing any of the offenses
listed in subsection 1 of this section shall be any number
of years but not less than fifteen years;
(3) Has previously been found guilty of committing or
attempting to commit any of the offenses listed in
subsection 1 of this section, or committing child
molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse
when classified as a class B felony shall be any number of
years but not less than fifteen years;
(4) Has previously been found guilty of child
molestation in the first degree or second degree, or sexual
abuse when classified as a class B felony, and is found
guilty of child molestation in the first or second degree,
or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony shall be
any number of years but not less than fifteen years;
(5) Is found to be a predatory sexual offender
pursuant to subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 5 of this
section shall be any number of years within the range to
which the person could have been sentenced pursuant to the
applicable law if the person was not found to be a predatory
sexual offender.
8. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the department of corrections, or any division
thereof, may not furlough an individual found to be and

SB 1294 100
sentenced as a persistent sexual offender or a predatory
sexual offender.
566.151. 1. A person twenty-one years of age or older
commits the offense of enticement of a child if he or she
persuades, solicits, coaxes, entices, or lures whether by
words, actions or through communication via the internet or
any electronic communication, any person who is less than
seventeen years of age for the purpose of engaging in sexual
conduct.
2. It is not a defense to a prosecution for a
violation of this section that the other person was a peace
officer masquerading as a minor.
3. Enticement of a child or an attempt to commit
enticement of a child is a class B felony for which the
authorized term of imprisonment shall be not less than five
years and not more than [thirty] fifteen years. [No person
convicted under this section shall be eligible for parole,
probation, conditional release, or suspended imposition or
execution of sentence for a period of five calendar years.]
566.203. 1. A person commits the offense of abusing
an individual through forced labor by knowingly providing or
obtaining the labor or services of a person:
(1) By causing or threatening to cause serious
physical injury to any person;
(2) By physically restraining or threatening to
physically restrain another person;
(3) By blackmail;
(4) By means of any scheme, plan, or pattern of
behavior intended to cause such person to believe that, if
the person does not perform the labor services, the person
or another person will suffer serious physical injury,
physical restraint, or financial harm; or

SB 1294 101
(5) By means of the abuse or threatened abuse of the
law or the legal process.
2. A person who is found guilty of the crime of abuse
through forced labor shall not be required to register as a
sexual offender pursuant to the provisions of section
589.400, unless such person is otherwise required to
register pursuant to the provisions of such section.
3. The offense of abuse through forced labor is [a
felony] punishable [by] as a class B felony. A person who
commits the offense of abuse through forced labor shall be
sentenced to imprisonment for a term of years not less than
five years and not more than [twenty] fifteen years and may
be assessed a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
4. If death results from a violation of this section,
or if the violation includes kidnapping or an attempt to
kidnap, sexual abuse when punishable as a class B felony, or
an attempt to commit sexual abuse when punishable as a class
B felony, or an attempt to kill, it shall be considered a
dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and shall be
punishable as a class A felony. A person found guilty
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be
sentenced to imprisonment for a term of years not less than
[five] ten years [or life] and not more than thirty years
and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
566.206. 1. A person commits the offense of
trafficking for the purposes of slavery, involuntary
servitude, peonage, or forced labor if he or she knowingly
recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or obtains
by any means, including but not limited to through the use
of force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail,
or causing or threatening to cause financial harm, another

SB 1294 102
person for labor or services, for the purposes of slavery,
involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor, or
benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value,
from participation in such activities.
2. A person who is found guilty of the offense of
trafficking for the purposes of slavery, involuntary
servitude, peonage, or forced labor shall not be required to
register as a sexual offender pursuant to the provisions of
section 589.400, unless he or she is otherwise required to
register pursuant to the provisions of such section.
3. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section,
the offense of trafficking for the purposes of slavery,
involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor is a class B
felony punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not
less than five years and not more than [twenty] fifteen
years and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
4. If death results from a violation of this section,
or if the violation includes kidnapping or an attempt to
kidnap, sexual abuse when punishable as a class B felony or
an attempt to commit sexual abuse when the sexual abuse
attempted is punishable as a class B felony, or an attempt
to kill, it shall be punishable [by] as a class A felony by
imprisonment for a term of years not less than [five] ten
years [or life] and not more than thirty years and a fine
not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
566.209. 1. A person commits the [crime] offense of
trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation if a
person knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports,
provides, advertises the availability of or obtains by any
means, including but not limited to through the use of
force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail, or

SB 1294 103
causing or threatening to cause financial harm, another
person for the use or employment of such person in a
commercial sex act, sexual conduct, a sexual performance, or
the production of explicit sexual material as defined in
section 573.010, without his or her consent, or benefits,
financially or by receiving anything of value, from
participation in such activities.
2. The [crime] offense of trafficking for the purposes
of sexual exploitation is a felony punishable as a class B
felony by imprisonment for a term of years not less than
five years and not more than [twenty] fifteen years and a
fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars. If
a violation of this section was effected by force,
abduction, or coercion, the crime of trafficking for the
purposes of sexual exploitation is a felony as a class A
felony punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not
less than ten years [or life] and not more than thirty years
and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
566.210. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual
trafficking of a child in the first degree if he or she
knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides,
or obtains by any means, including but not limited to
through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud,
deception, blackmail, or causing or threatening to cause
financial harm, a person under the age of fourteen to
participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance,
or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in
section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving
anything of value, from participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of fourteen to
engage in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the

SB 1294 104
production of explicit sexual material as defined in section
573.010; or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the
age of fourteen to participate in a commercial sex act, a
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant
believed that the person was fourteen years of age or older.
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the
first degree is a felony for which the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for
probation or parole [until the offender has served not less
than thirty years of such sentence. Subsection 4 of section
558.019 shall not apply to the sentence of a person who has
been found guilty of sexual trafficking of a child less than
fourteen years of age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean
imprisonment for the duration of a person's natural life for
the purposes of this section].
566.211. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual
trafficking of a child in the second degree if he or she
knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides,
or obtains by any means, including but not limited to
through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud,
deception, blackmail, or causing or threatening to cause
financial harm, a person under the age of eighteen to
participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance,
or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in
section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving
anything of value, from participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of eighteen to
engage in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the

SB 1294 105
production of explicit sexual material as defined in section
573.010; or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the
age of eighteen to participate in a commercial sex act, a
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant
believed that the person was eighteen years of age or older.
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the
second degree is a class A felony punishable by imprisonment
for a term of years not less than [twenty] ten years [or
life] and not more than thirty years and a fine not to
exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars if the child is
under the age of eighteen. If a violation of this section
was effected by force, abduction, or coercion, the crime of
sexual trafficking of a child shall be a class A felony for
which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole
until the defendant has served [not less than twenty-five
years of such sentence] eighty-five percent of his or her
minimum prison term as provided in section 558.011.
567.050. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting
prostitution in the first degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Promotes prostitution by compelling a person to
enter into, engage in, or remain in prostitution;
(2) Promotes prostitution of a person less than
sixteen years of age; or
(3) Owns, manages, or operates an interactive computer
service, or conspires or attempts to do so, with the intent
to promote or facilitate the prostitution of another. As
used in this subdivision, the term "interactive computer
service" shall mean any information service, system, or

SB 1294 106
access software provider that provides or enables computer
access by multiple users to a computer server, including
specifically a service or system that provides access to the
internet and such systems operated or services offered by
libraries or educational institutions.
2. The term "compelling" includes:
(1) The use of forcible compulsion;
(2) The use of a drug or intoxicating substance to
render a person incapable of controlling his conduct or
appreciating its nature;
(3) Withholding or threatening to withhold dangerous
drugs or a narcotic from a drug dependent person.
3. (1) The offense of promoting prostitution in the
first degree under subdivision (1) [or (3)] of subsection 1
of this section is a class B felony.
(2) The offense of promoting prostitution in the first
degree under [subdivision] subdivisions (2) and (3) of
subsection 1 of this section is a class A felony if a person
acts in reckless disregard of the fact that such conduct
contributed to the offense of trafficking for the purposes
of sexual exploitation under section 566.209.
(3) The offense of promoting prostitution in the first
degree under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section
is a class A felony punishable by a term of imprisonment not
less than ten years and not to exceed [fifteen] thirty years.
4. A person injured by the acts committed in violation
of subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section or
subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this section shall have a
civil cause of action to recover damages and reasonable
[attorneys'] attorney's fees for such injury.
5. In addition to the court's authority to order a
defendant to make restitution for the damage or loss caused

SB 1294 107
by his or her offense as provided in section 559.105, the
court shall enter a judgment of restitution against the
defendant convicted of violating subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of this section and subdivision (2) of
subsection 3 of this section.
568.060. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or
mental injury against a child by any person eighteen years
of age or older. For purposes of this section, abuse shall
not include injury inflicted on a child by accidental means
by a person with care, custody, or control of the child, or
discipline of a child by a person with care, custody, or
control of the child, including spanking, in a reasonable
manner;
(2) "Abusive head trauma", a serious physical injury
to the head or brain caused by any means, including but not
limited to shaking, jerking, pushing, pulling, slamming,
hitting, or kicking;
(3) "Mental injury", an injury to the intellectual or
psychological capacity or the emotional condition of a child
as evidenced by an observable and substantial impairment of
the ability of the child to function within his or her
normal range of performance or behavior;
(4) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by those
responsible for the care, custody, and control of a child
under the age of eighteen years, the care reasonable and
necessary to maintain the physical and mental health of the
child, when such failure presents a substantial probability
that death or physical injury or sexual injury would result;
(5) "Physical injury", physical pain, illness, or any
impairment of physical condition, including but not limited

SB 1294 108
to bruising, lacerations, hematomas, welts, or permanent or
temporary disfigurement and impairment of any bodily
function or organ;
(6) "Serious emotional injury", an injury that creates
a substantial risk of temporary or permanent medical or
psychological damage, manifested by impairment of a
behavioral, cognitive, or physical condition. Serious
emotional injury shall be established by testimony of
qualified experts upon the reasonable expectation of
probable harm to a reasonable degree of medical or
psychological certainty;
(7) "Serious physical injury", a physical injury that
creates a substantial risk of death or that causes serious
disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any part of the body.
2. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of
a child if such person knowingly causes a child who is less
than eighteen years of age:
(1) To suffer physical or mental injury as a result of
abuse or neglect; or
(2) To be placed in a situation in which the child may
suffer physical or mental injury as the result of abuse or
neglect.
3. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of
a child if such person recklessly causes a child who is less
than eighteen years of age to suffer from abusive head
trauma.
4. A person does not commit the offense of abuse or
neglect of a child by virtue of the sole fact that the
person delivers or allows the delivery of a child to a
provider of emergency services.

SB 1294 109
5. (1) A person does not commit the offense of abuse
or neglect of a child by virtue of the sole fact that the
person allows the child to engage in independent activities
without adult supervision and the person is a parent to the
child or is responsible for the child's care, provided that
the:
(a) Independent activities are appropriate based on
the child's age, maturity, and physical and mental
abilities; and
(b) Lack of adult supervision does not constitute
conduct that is so grossly negligent as to endanger the
health or safety of the child.
(2) As used in this subsection, "independent
activities" shall include traveling to or from school or
nearby locations by bicycle or on foot, playing outdoors, or
remaining at home for a reasonable period of time without
adult supervision.
6. The offense of abuse or neglect of a child is:
(1) A class D felony, [without eligibility for
probation, parole, or conditional release until the
defendant has served no less than one year of such sentence]
punishable by a term of imprisonment not to exceed seven
years, unless the person has previously been found guilty of
a violation of this section or of a violation of the law of
any other jurisdiction that prohibits the same or similar
conduct or the injury inflicted on the child is a serious
emotional injury or a serious physical injury, in which case
abuse or neglect of a child is a class [B] A felony,
[without eligibility for probation or parole until the
defendant has served not less than five years of such
sentence] punishable by a term of imprisonment not less than
ten years and not to exceed thirty years; or

SB 1294 110
(2) A class A felony, subject to a term of
imprisonment not less than ten years and not to exceed
thirty years, if the child dies as a result of injuries
sustained from conduct chargeable under the provisions of
this section.
7. Notwithstanding subsection 6 of this section to the
contrary, the offense of abuse or neglect of a child is a
class A felony, without eligibility for probation[,] or
parole[, or conditional release] until the defendant has
100 served not less than [fifteen] ten years and not to exceed
101 thirty years of such sentence, if:
102 (1) The injury is a serious emotional injury or a
103 serious physical injury;
104 (2) The child is less than fourteen years of age; and
105 (3) The injury is the result of sexual abuse or sexual
106 abuse in the first degree as defined under section 566.100
107 or sexual exploitation of a minor as defined under section
108 573.023.
109 8. The circuit or prosecuting attorney may refer a
110 person who is suspected of abuse or neglect of a child to an
111 appropriate public or private agency for treatment or
112 counseling so long as the agency has consented to taking
113 such referrals. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the
114 discretion of the circuit or prosecuting attorney to
115 prosecute a person who has been referred for treatment or
116 counseling pursuant to this subsection.
117 9. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter
118 the requirement that every element of any crime referred to
119 herein must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt.
120 10. Discipline, including spanking administered in a
121 reasonable manner, shall not be construed to be abuse under
122 this section.

SB 1294 111
570.030. 1. A person commits the offense of stealing
if he or she:
(1) Appropriates property or services of another with
the purpose to deprive him or her thereof, either without
his or her consent or by means of deceit or coercion;
(2) Attempts to appropriate anhydrous ammonia or
liquid nitrogen of another with the purpose to deprive him
or her thereof, either without his or her consent or by
means of deceit or coercion; or
(3) For the purpose of depriving the owner of a lawful
interest therein, receives, retains or disposes of property
of another knowing that it has been stolen, or believing
that it has been stolen.
2. The offense of stealing is a class A felony if the
property appropriated consists of any of the following
containing any amount of anhydrous ammonia: a tank truck,
tank trailer, rail tank car, bulk storage tank, field nurse,
field tank or field applicator.
3. The offense of stealing is a class B felony and
subject to a term of imprisonment not less than five years
and not more than fifteen years if:
(1) The property appropriated or attempted to be
appropriated consists of any amount of anhydrous ammonia or
liquid nitrogen;
(2) The property consists of any animal considered
livestock as the term livestock is defined in section
144.010, or any captive wildlife held under permit issued by
the conservation commission, and the value of the animal or
animals appropriated exceeds three thousand dollars and that
person has previously been found guilty of appropriating any
animal considered livestock or captive wildlife held under
permit issued by the conservation commission.

SB 1294 112
[Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such
person shall serve a minimum prison term of not less than
eighty percent of his or her sentence before he or she is
eligible for probation, parole, conditional release, or
other early release by the department of corrections];
(3) A person appropriates property consisting of a
motor vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft, and that person has
previously been found guilty of two stealing-related
offenses committed on two separate occasions where such
offenses occurred within ten years of the date of occurrence
of the present offense;
(4) The property appropriated or attempted to be
appropriated consists of any animal considered livestock as
the term is defined in section 144.010 if the value of the
livestock exceeds ten thousand dollars;
(5) The property appropriated or attempted to be
appropriated is owned by or in the custody of a financial
institution and the property is taken or attempted to be
taken physically from an individual person to deprive the
owner or custodian of the property; or
(6) The person appropriates property, the person's
course of conduct is part of an organized retail theft, and
the value of the property taken, combined with any property
damage inflicted in such theft, is ten thousand dollars or
more.
4. The offense of stealing is a class C felony if:
(1) The value of the property or services appropriated
is twenty-five thousand dollars or more;
(2) The property is a teller machine or the contents
of a teller machine, including cash, regardless of the value
or amount; or

SB 1294 113
(3) The person appropriates property, the person's
course of conduct is part of an organized retail theft, and
the value of the property taken, combined with any property
damage inflicted in such theft, is seven hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than ten thousand dollars.
5. The offense of stealing is a class D felony and
subject to a term of imprisonment not to exceed seven years
if:
(1) The value of the property or services appropriated
is seven hundred fifty dollars or more;
(2) The offender physically takes the property
appropriated from the person of the victim; or
(3) The property appropriated consists of:
(a) Any motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft;
(b) Any will or unrecorded deed affecting real
property;
(c) Any credit device, debit device or letter of
credit;
(d) Any firearms;
(e) Any explosive weapon as defined in section 571.010;
(f) Any United States national flag designed, intended
and used for display on buildings or stationary flagstaffs
in the open;
(g) Any original copy of an act, bill or resolution,
introduced or acted upon by the legislature of the state of
Missouri;
(h) Any pleading, notice, judgment or any other record
or entry of any court of this state, any other state or of
the United States;
(i) Any book of registration or list of voters
required by chapter 115;

SB 1294 114
(j) Any animal considered livestock as that term is
defined in section 144.010;
(k) Any live fish raised for commercial sale with a
value of seventy-five dollars or more;
(l) Any captive wildlife held under permit issued by
100 the conservation commission;
101 (m) Any controlled substance as defined by section
102 195.010;
103 (n) Ammonium nitrate;
104 (o) Any wire, electrical transformer, or metallic wire
105 associated with transmitting telecommunications, video,
106 internet, or voice over internet protocol service, or any
107 other device or pipe that is associated with conducting
108 electricity or transporting natural gas or other combustible
109 fuels; or
110 (p) Any material appropriated with the intent to use
111 such material to manufacture, compound, produce, prepare,
112 test or analyze amphetamine or methamphetamine or any of
113 their analogues.
114 6. The offense of stealing is a class E felony and
115 subject to a term of imprisonment not to exceed four years
116 if:
117 (1) The property appropriated is an animal;
118 (2) The property is a catalytic converter;
119 (3) A person has previously been found guilty of three
120 stealing-related offenses committed on three separate
121 occasions where such offenses occurred within ten years of
122 the date of occurrence of the present offense; or
123 (4) The property appropriated is a letter, postal
124 card, package, bag, or other sealed article that was
125 delivered by a common carrier or delivery service and not
126 yet received by the addressee or that had been left to be

SB 1294 115
127 collected for shipment by a common carrier or delivery
128 service.
129 7. The offense of stealing is a class D misdemeanor if
130 the property is not of a type listed in subsection 2, 3, 5,
131 or 6 of this section, the property appropriated has a value
132 of less than one hundred fifty dollars, and the person has
133 no previous findings of guilt for a stealing-related offense.
134 8. The offense of stealing is a class A misdemeanor if
135 no other penalty is specified in this section.
136 9. If a violation of this section is subject to
137 enhanced punishment based on prior findings of guilt, such
138 findings of guilt shall be pleaded and proven in the same
139 manner as required by section 558.021.
140 10. The appropriation of any property or services of a
141 type listed in subsection 2, 3, 5, or 6 of this section or
142 of a value of seven hundred fifty dollars or more may be
143 considered a separate felony and may be charged in separate
144 counts.
145 11. The value of property or services appropriated
146 pursuant to one scheme or course of conduct, whether from
147 the same or several owners and whether at the same or
148 different times, constitutes a single criminal episode and
149 may be aggregated in determining the grade of the offense,
150 except as set forth in subsection 10 of this section.
151 12. As used in this section, the term "organized
152 retail theft" means:
153 (1) Any act of stealing committed by one or more
154 persons, as part of any agreement to steal property from any
155 business, and separate acts of stealing that are part of any
156 ongoing agreement to steal may be aggregated for the purpose
157 of determining value regardless of whether such acts are
158 committed in the same jurisdiction or at the same time;

SB 1294 116
159 (2) Any act of receiving or possessing any property
160 that has been taken or stolen in violation of subdivision
161 (1) of this subsection while knowing or having reasonable
162 grounds to believe the property is stolen from any business
163 in violation of this section, and separate acts of receiving
164 or possessing such stolen property that are part of any
165 ongoing agreement to receive or possess such stolen property
166 may be aggregated for the purpose of determining value
167 regardless of whether such acts are committed in the same
168 jurisdiction or at the same time; or
169 (3) Any act of organizing, supervising, financing,
170 leading, or managing between one or more persons to engage
171 for profit in a scheme or course of conduct to effectuate or
172 intend to effectuate the transfer or sale of property stolen
173 from any business in violation of this section, and separate
174 acts of organizing, supervising, financing, leading, or
175 managing between one or more persons to engage for profit in
176 a scheme or course of conduct to effectuate or intend to
177 effectuate the transfer or sale of such stolen property that
178 are part of any ongoing agreement to organize, supervise,
179 finance, lead, or manage between one or more persons to
180 engage for profit in a scheme or course of conduct to
181 effectuate or intend to effectuate the transfer or sale of
182 such stolen property may be aggregated for the purpose of
183 determining the value regardless of whether such acts are
184 committed in the same jurisdiction or at the same time.
185 13. If any prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney
186 makes a request in writing to the attorney general, the
187 attorney general shall have the authority to commence and
188 prosecute the offense of stealing if such offense involves
189 organized retail theft, and any other offenses that directly
190 arise from or causally occur as a result of an alleged

SB 1294 117
191 violation of the offense of stealing involving organized
192 retail theft, in each or any county or a city not within a
193 county in which the offense occurred with the same power and
194 authority granted to prosecuting attorneys in section 56.060
195 and circuit attorneys in section 56.450, except that all
196 costs and fees of such prosecution by the attorney general
197 shall be paid by the state and not by any county or local
198 government.
199 14. No provision of this section shall grant any
200 additional power to the attorney general beyond commencement
201 and prosecution of offenses as authorized in this section.
571.015. 1. Any person who commits any felony under
the laws of this state by, with, or through the use,
assistance, or aid of a dangerous instrument or deadly
weapon is also guilty of the offense of armed criminal
action; the offense of armed criminal action shall be [an
unclassified] a class B felony and, upon conviction, shall
be punished by imprisonment by the department of corrections
for a term of not less than [three] five years and not to
exceed fifteen years[, unless the person is unlawfully
possessing a firearm, in which case the term of imprisonment
shall be for a term of not less than five years. The
punishment imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be in
addition to and consecutive to any punishment provided by
law for the crime committed by, with, or through the use,
assistance, or aid of a dangerous instrument or deadly
weapon. No person convicted under this subsection shall be
eligible for parole, probation, conditional release, or
suspended imposition or execution of sentence for a period
of three calendar years].
2. Any person convicted of a second offense of armed
criminal action under subsection 1 of this section shall be

SB 1294 118
a class A felony and punished by imprisonment by the
department of corrections for a term of not less than [five]
ten years and not to exceed thirty years[, unless the person
is unlawfully possessing a firearm, in which case the term
of imprisonment shall be for a term not less than fifteen
years. The punishment imposed pursuant to this subsection
shall be in addition to and consecutive to any punishment
provided by law for the crime committed by, with, or through
the use, assistance, or aid of a dangerous instrument or
deadly weapon. No person convicted under this subsection
shall be eligible for parole, probation, conditional
release, or suspended imposition or execution of sentence
for a period of five calendar years].
3. Any person convicted of a third or subsequent
offense of armed criminal action under subsection 1 of this
section shall be [punished by] sentenced to life
imprisonment without the possibility of probation or parole
by the department of corrections [for a term of not less
than ten years, unless the person is unlawfully possessing a
firearm, in which case the term of imprisonment shall be no
less than fifteen years. The punishment imposed pursuant to
this subsection shall be in addition to and consecutive to
any punishment provided by law for the crime committed by,
with, or through the use, assistance, or aid of a dangerous
instrument or deadly weapon. No person convicted under this
subsection shall be eligible for parole, probation,
conditional release, or suspended imposition or execution of
sentence for a period of ten calendar years].
571.030. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
use of weapons, except as otherwise provided by sections
571.101 to 571.121, if he or she knowingly:

SB 1294 119
(1) Carries concealed upon or about his or her person
a knife, a firearm, a blackjack or any other weapon readily
capable of lethal use into any area where firearms are
restricted under section 571.107; or
(2) Sets a spring gun; or
(3) Discharges or shoots a firearm into a dwelling
house, a railroad train, boat, aircraft, or motor vehicle as
defined in section 302.010, or any building or structure
used for the assembling of people; or
(4) Exhibits, in the presence of one or more persons,
any weapon readily capable of lethal use in an angry or
threatening manner; or
(5) Has a firearm or projectile weapon readily capable
of lethal use on his or her person, while he or she is
intoxicated, and handles or otherwise uses such firearm or
projectile weapon in either a negligent or unlawful manner
or discharges such firearm or projectile weapon unless
acting in self-defense; or
(6) Discharges a firearm within one hundred yards of
any occupied schoolhouse, courthouse, or church building; or
(7) Discharges or shoots a firearm at a mark, at any
object, or at random, on, along or across a public highway
or discharges or shoots a firearm into any outbuilding; or
(8) Carries a firearm or any other weapon readily
capable of lethal use into any church or place where people
have assembled for worship, or into any election precinct on
any election day, or into any building owned or occupied by
any agency of the federal government, state government, or
political subdivision thereof; or
(9) Discharges or shoots a firearm at or from a motor
vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, discharges or shoots
a firearm at any person, or at any other motor vehicle, or

SB 1294 120
at any building or habitable structure, unless the person
was lawfully acting in self-defense; or
(10) Carries a firearm, whether loaded or unloaded, or
any other weapon readily capable of lethal use into any
school, onto any school bus, or onto the premises of any
function or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school
officials or the district school board; or
(11) Possesses a firearm while also knowingly in
possession of a controlled substance that is sufficient for
a felony violation of section 579.015.
2. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of
this section shall not apply to the persons described in
this subsection, regardless of whether such uses are
reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
fulfillment of such person's official duties except as
otherwise provided in this subsection. Subdivisions (3),
(4), (6), (7), and (9) of subsection 1 of this section shall
not apply to or affect any of the following persons, when
such uses are reasonably associated with or are necessary to
the fulfillment of such person's official duties, except as
otherwise provided in this subsection:
(1) All state, county and municipal peace officers who
have completed the training required by the police officer
standards and training commission pursuant to sections
590.030 to 590.050 and who possess the duty and power of
arrest for violation of the general criminal laws of the
state or for violation of ordinances of counties or
municipalities of the state, whether such officers are on or
off duty, and whether such officers are within or outside of
the law enforcement agency's jurisdiction, or all qualified
retired peace officers, as defined in subsection 12 of this
section, and who carry the identification defined in

SB 1294 121
subsection 13 of this section, or any person summoned by
such officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the
peace while actually engaged in assisting such officer;
(2) Wardens, superintendents and keepers of prisons,
penitentiaries, jails and other institutions for the
detention of persons accused or convicted of crime;
(3) Members of the Armed Forces or National Guard
while performing their official duty;
(4) Those persons vested by Article V, Section 1 of
the Constitution of Missouri with the judicial power of the
state and those persons vested by Article III of the
Constitution of the United States with the judicial power of
the United States, the members of the federal judiciary;
(5) Any person whose bona fide duty is to execute
process, civil or criminal;
(6) Any federal probation officer or federal flight
deck officer as defined under the federal flight deck
officer program, 49 U.S.C. Section 44921, regardless of
whether such officers are on duty, or within the law
enforcement agency's jurisdiction;
(7) Any state probation or parole officer, including
supervisors and members of the parole board;
(8) Any corporate security advisor meeting the
definition and fulfilling the requirements of the
regulations established by the department of public safety
under section 590.750;
(9) Any coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or
assistant medical examiner;
(10) Any municipal or county prosecuting attorney or
assistant prosecuting attorney; circuit attorney or
assistant circuit attorney; municipal, associate, or circuit
judge; or any person appointed by a court to be a special

SB 1294 122
100 prosecutor who has completed the firearms safety training
101 course required under subsection 2 of section 571.111;
102 (11) Any member of a fire department or fire
103 protection district who is employed on a full-time basis as
104 a fire investigator and who has a valid concealed carry
105 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a valid
106 concealed carry permit under section 571.111 when such uses
107 are reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
108 fulfillment of such person's official duties; and
109 (12) Upon the written approval of the governing body
110 of a fire department or fire protection district, any paid
111 fire department or fire protection district member who is
112 employed on a full-time basis and who has a valid concealed
113 carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a
114 valid concealed carry permit, when such uses are reasonably
115 associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such
116 person's official duties.
117 3. Subdivisions (1), (5), (8), and (10) of subsection
118 1 of this section do not apply when the actor is
119 transporting such weapons in a nonfunctioning state or in an
120 unloaded state when ammunition is not readily accessible or
121 when such weapons are not readily accessible. Subdivision
122 (1) of subsection 1 of this section does not apply to any
123 person nineteen years of age or older or eighteen years of
124 age or older and a member of the United States Armed Forces,
125 or honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces,
126 transporting a concealable firearm in the passenger
127 compartment of a motor vehicle, so long as such concealable
128 firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed, nor when the actor
129 is also in possession of an exposed firearm or projectile
130 weapon for the lawful pursuit of game, or is in his or her
131 dwelling unit or upon premises over which the actor has

SB 1294 123
132 possession, authority or control, or is traveling in a
133 continuous journey peaceably through this state.
134 Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this section does not
135 apply if the firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed by a
136 person while traversing school premises for the purposes of
137 transporting a student to or from school, or possessed by an
138 adult for the purposes of facilitation of a school-
139 sanctioned firearm-related event or club event.
140 4. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of
141 this section shall not apply to any person who has a valid
142 concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101
143 to 571.121, a valid concealed carry endorsement issued
144 before August 28, 2013, or a valid permit or endorsement to
145 carry concealed firearms issued by another state or
146 political subdivision of another state.
147 5. Subdivisions (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and
148 (10) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
149 persons who are engaged in a lawful act of defense pursuant
150 to section 563.031.
151 6. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
152 the contrary, the state shall not prohibit any state
153 employee from having a firearm in the employee's vehicle on
154 the state's property provided that the vehicle is locked and
155 the firearm is not visible. This subsection shall only
156 apply to the state as an employer when the state employee's
157 vehicle is on property owned or leased by the state and the
158 state employee is conducting activities within the scope of
159 his or her employment. For the purposes of this subsection,
160 "state employee" means an employee of the executive,
161 legislative, or judicial branch of the government of the
162 state of Missouri.

SB 1294 124
163 7. (1) Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this
164 section shall not apply to a person who is a school officer
165 commissioned by the district school board under section
166 162.215 or who is a school protection officer, as described
167 under section 160.665.
168 (2) Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful for
169 a student to actually participate in school-sanctioned gun
170 safety courses, student military or ROTC courses, or other
171 school-sponsored or club-sponsored firearm-related events,
172 provided the student does not carry a firearm or other
173 weapon readily capable of lethal use into any school, onto
174 any school bus, or onto the premises of any other function
175 or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school officials or
176 the district school board.
177 8. A person who commits the crime of unlawful use of
178 weapons under:
179 (1) Subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (11) of subsection 1
180 of this section shall be guilty of a class E felony;
181 (2) Subdivision (1), (6), (7), or (8) of subsection 1
182 of this section shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor,
183 except when a concealed weapon is carried onto any private
184 property whose owner has posted the premises as being off-
185 limits to concealed firearms by means of one or more signs
186 displayed in a conspicuous place of a minimum size of eleven
187 inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in
188 letters of not less than one inch, in which case the
189 penalties of subsection 2 of section 571.107 shall apply;
190 (3) Subdivision (5) or (10) of subsection 1 of this
191 section shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the
192 firearm is unloaded and a class E felony if the firearm is
193 loaded;

SB 1294 125
194 (4) Subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section
195 shall be guilty of a class B felony, except that if the
196 violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section
197 results in injury or death to another person, it is a class
198 A felony.
199 9. Violations of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of
200 this section shall be punished as follows:
201 (1) For the first violation a person shall be
202 sentenced to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for
203 a class B felony, including a term of years not less than
204 five and not more than fifteen;
205 (2) For any violation by a prior offender as defined
206 in section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to the
207 maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B felony
208 [without the possibility of parole, probation or conditional
209 release for a term of ten years];
210 (3) For any violation by a persistent offender as
211 defined in section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to
212 the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B
213 felony [without the possibility of parole, probation, or
214 conditional release];
215 (4) For any violation which results in injury or death
216 to another person, a person shall be sentenced to an
217 authorized disposition for a class A felony, including a
218 term of imprisonment not less than ten years and not more
219 than thirty years.
220 10. Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other
221 person in the violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1
222 of this section shall be subject to the same penalty as that
223 prescribed by this section for violations by other persons.
224 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
225 person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a felony

SB 1294 126
226 violation of subsection 1 of this section shall receive a
227 suspended imposition of sentence if such person has
228 previously received a suspended imposition of sentence for
229 any other firearms- or weapons-related felony offense.
230 12. As used in this section "qualified retired peace
231 officer" means an individual who:
232 (1) Retired in good standing from service with a
233 public agency as a peace officer, other than for reasons of
234 mental instability;
235 (2) Before such retirement, was authorized by law to
236 engage in or supervise the prevention, detection,
237 investigation, or prosecution of, or the incarceration of
238 any person for, any violation of law, and had statutory
239 powers of arrest;
240 (3) Before such retirement, was regularly employed as
241 a peace officer for an aggregate of fifteen years or more,
242 or retired from service with such agency, after completing
243 any applicable probationary period of such service, due to a
244 service-connected disability, as determined by such agency;
245 (4) Has a nonforfeitable right to benefits under the
246 retirement plan of the agency if such a plan is available;
247 (5) During the most recent twelve-month period, has
248 met, at the expense of the individual, the standards for
249 training and qualification for active peace officers to
250 carry firearms;
251 (6) Is not under the influence of alcohol or another
252 intoxicating or hallucinatory drug or substance; and
253 (7) Is not prohibited by federal law from receiving a
254 firearm.
255 13. The identification required by subdivision (1) of
256 subsection 2 of this section is:

SB 1294 127
257 (1) A photographic identification issued by the agency
258 from which the individual retired from service as a peace
259 officer that indicates that the individual has, not less
260 recently than one year before the date the individual is
261 carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or otherwise
262 found by the agency to meet the standards established by the
263 agency for training and qualification for active peace
264 officers to carry a firearm of the same type as the
265 concealed firearm; or
266 (2) A photographic identification issued by the agency
267 from which the individual retired from service as a peace
268 officer; and
269 (3) A certification issued by the state in which the
270 individual resides that indicates that the individual has,
271 not less recently than one year before the date the
272 individual is carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or
273 otherwise found by the state to meet the standards
274 established by the state for training and qualification for
275 active peace officers to carry a firearm of the same type as
276 the concealed firearm.
573.025. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting
child pornography in the first degree if, knowing of its
content and character, such person possesses with the intent
to promote or promotes child pornography of a child less
than fourteen years of age or obscene material portraying
what appears to be a child less than fourteen years of age.
2. The offense of promoting child pornography in the
first degree is a class B felony, punishable by a term of
imprisonment not less than five years and not more than
fifteen years, unless the person knowingly promotes such
material to a minor, in which case it is a class A felony,
punishable by a term of imprisonment not less than ten years

SB 1294 128
and not more than thirty years. [No person who is found
guilty of promoting child pornography in the first degree
shall be eligible for probation, parole, or conditional
release for a period of three calendar years.]
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
require a provider of electronic communication services or
remote computing services to monitor any user, subscriber or
customer of the provider, or the content of any
communication of any user, subscriber or customer of the
provider.
575.151. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as "Valentine's Law".
2. A person commits the offense of aggravated fleeing
a stop or detention of a motor vehicle if he or she knows or
reasonably should know that a law enforcement officer is
attempting to detain or stop a motor vehicle, and for the
purpose of preventing the officer from effecting the stop or
detention, he or she flees and:
(1) Such person operates a motor vehicle at a high
speed or in any manner which creates a substantial risk of
serious physical injury or death to any person;
(2) As a result of such flight causes physical injury
to another person; or
(3) As a result of such flight causes death to another
person.
3. A person is presumed to be fleeing a vehicle stop
or detention if he or she continues to operate a motor
vehicle after he or she has seen or reasonably should have
seen clearly visible emergency lights or has heard or
reasonably should have heard an audible signal emanating
from the law enforcement vehicle pursuing him or her.

SB 1294 129
4. It is no defense to a prosecution pursuant to
subsection 2 of this section that the law enforcement
officer was acting unlawfully in making the arrest.
However, nothing in this section shall be construed to bar
civil suits for unlawful arrest. A person need not know the
basis for the arrest, detention, or stop, only that the
person was being stopped or detained.
5. The offense of aggravated fleeing a stop or
detention in violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class D felony, [without eligibility
for probation, parole, or conditional release until the
defendant has served no less than one year of such sentence]
punishable by a term of imprisonment not to exceed seven
years. The offense of aggravated fleeing a stop or
detention in violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class B felony, punishable by a term
of imprisonment not less than five years and not to exceed
fifteen years. The offense of aggravated fleeing a stop or
detention in violation of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class A felony, punishable by a term
of imprisonment not less than ten years and not to exceed
thirty years.
575.270. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering
with a witness or victim if:
(1) With the purpose to induce a witness or a
prospective witness to disobey a subpoena or other legal
process, absent himself or herself, avoid subpoena or other
legal process, withhold evidence, information, or documents,
or testify falsely, he or she:
(a) Threatens or causes harm to any person or
property; or
(b) Uses force, threats or deception; or

SB 1294 130
(c) Offers, confers or agrees to confer any benefit,
direct or indirect, upon such witness; or
(d) Conveys any of the foregoing to another in
furtherance of a conspiracy; or
(2) He or she purposely prevents or dissuades or
attempts to prevent or dissuade any person who has been a
victim of any crime or a person who is acting on behalf of
any such victim from:
(a) Making any report of such victimization to any
peace officer, state, local or federal law enforcement
officer, prosecuting agency, or judge;
(b) Causing a complaint, indictment or information to
be sought and prosecuted or assisting in the prosecution
thereof;
(c) Arresting or causing or seeking the arrest of any
person in connection with such victimization.
2. The offense of tampering with a witness or victim
is a class A misdemeanor, unless the original charge is a
felony, in which case [tampering with a witness or victim is
a class D felony. Persons convicted under this section
shall not be eligible for parole] a person convicted under
this section shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment
one felony class lower than that of the original charge.
577.010. 1. A person commits the offense of driving
while intoxicated if he or she operates a vehicle while in
an intoxicated condition.
2. The offense of driving while intoxicated is:
(1) A class B misdemeanor;
(2) A class A misdemeanor if:
(a) The defendant is a prior offender; or
(b) A person less than seventeen years of age is
present in the vehicle;

SB 1294 131
(3) A class E felony if:
(a) The defendant is a persistent offender; or
(b) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause physical injury to
another person;
(4) A class D felony if:
(a) The defendant is an aggravated offender;
(b) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause physical injury to a
law enforcement officer or emergency personnel; or
(c) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause serious physical
injury to another person;
(5) A class C felony if:
(a) The defendant is a chronic offender;
(b) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause serious physical
injury to a law enforcement officer or emergency personnel;
or
(c) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause the death of another
person;
(6) A class B felony if:
(a) The defendant is a habitual offender;
(b) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause the death of a law
enforcement officer or emergency personnel;
(c) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause the death of any
person not a passenger in the vehicle operated by the
defendant, including the death of an individual that results

SB 1294 132
from the defendant's vehicle leaving a highway, as defined
in section 301.010, or the highway's right-of-way;
(d) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause the death of two or
more persons; or
(e) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant
acts with criminal negligence to cause the death of any
person while he or she has a blood alcohol content of at
least eighteen-hundredths of one percent by weight of
alcohol in such person's blood;
(7) A class A felony if the defendant has previously
been found guilty of an offense under paragraphs (a) to (e)
of subdivision (6) of this subsection and is found guilty of
a subsequent violation of such paragraphs.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section, a person found guilty of the offense of
driving while intoxicated as a first offense shall not be
granted a suspended imposition of sentence:
(1) Unless such person shall be placed on probation
for a minimum of two years; or
(2) In a circuit where a DWI court or docket created
under section 478.007 or other court-ordered treatment
program is available, and where the offense was committed
with fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight of
alcohol in such person's blood, unless the individual
participates and successfully completes a program under such
DWI court or docket or other court-ordered treatment program.
4. If a person is found guilty of a second or
subsequent offense of driving while intoxicated, the court
may order the person to submit to a period of continuous
alcohol monitoring or verifiable breath alcohol testing

SB 1294 133
performed a minimum of four times per day as a condition of
probation.
5. If a person is not granted a suspended imposition
of sentence for the reasons described in subsection 3 of
this section:
(1) If the individual operated the vehicle with
fifteen-hundredths to twenty-hundredths of one percent by
weight of alcohol in such person's blood, the required term
of imprisonment shall be not less than forty-eight hours;
(2) If the individual operated the vehicle with
greater than twenty-hundredths of one percent by weight of
alcohol in such person's blood, the required term of
imprisonment shall be not less than five days.
6. A person found guilty of the offense of driving
while intoxicated:
(1) As a prior offender, persistent offender,
aggravated offender, chronic offender, or habitual offender
shall not be granted a suspended imposition of sentence or
be sentenced to pay a fine in lieu of a term of
imprisonment, section 557.011 to the contrary
notwithstanding;
(2) As a prior offender shall not be granted parole or
probation until he or she has served a minimum of ten days
imprisonment:
(a) Unless as a condition of such parole or probation
such person performs at least thirty days of community
service under the supervision of the court in those
jurisdictions which have a recognized program for community
100 service; or
101 (b) The offender participates in and successfully
102 completes a program established under section 478.007 or
103 other court-ordered treatment program, if available, and as

SB 1294 134
104 part of either program, the offender performs at least
105 thirty days of community service under the supervision of
106 the court;
107 (3) As a persistent offender shall not be eligible for
108 parole or probation until he or she has served a minimum of
109 thirty days imprisonment:
110 (a) Unless as a condition of such parole or probation
111 such person performs at least sixty days of community
112 service under the supervision of the court in those
113 jurisdictions which have a recognized program for community
114 service; or
115 (b) The offender participates in and successfully
116 completes a program established under section 478.007 or
117 other court-ordered treatment program, if available, and as
118 part of either program, the offender performs at least sixty
119 days of community service under the supervision of the court;
120 (4) As an aggravated offender shall not be eligible
121 for parole or probation until he or she has served a minimum
122 of sixty days imprisonment; and
123 (5) [As a chronic or habitual offender shall not be
124 eligible for parole or probation until he or she has served
125 a minimum of two years imprisonment; and
126 (6)] Any probation or parole granted under this
127 subsection may include a period of continuous alcohol
128 monitoring or verifiable breath alcohol testing performed a
129 minimum of four times per day.
578.425. Any person who is convicted of a felony which
is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in
association with, any criminal street gang, with the purpose
to promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by
gang members, shall be punished in the following manner:

SB 1294 135
(1) Any person who violates this section in the
commission of a felony shall, upon conviction of that
felony, in addition [and consecutive] to the punishment
prescribed for the felony of which he or she has been
convicted, be [punished by] guilty of an additional class E
felony under the terms of this section and be sentenced to a
term of [two] imprisonment not to exceed four years. If the
underlying felony is committed on the grounds of, or within
one thousand feet of a public or private elementary,
vocational, junior high or high school, the additional
conviction shall be considered a class D felony, punishable
by a term [shall be three] of imprisonment not to exceed
seven years; and
(2) Any person who violates this section in the
commission of a dangerous felony shall, upon conviction of
that dangerous felony, in addition [and consecutive] to the
punishment prescribed for the dangerous felony of which he
or she has been convicted, be [punished by] guilty of an
additional class D felony under the terms of this section
and be sentenced to a term of [five] imprisonment not to
exceed seven years.
[(3) Any person who violates this section in the
commission of a felony punishable by death or imprisonment
for life shall not be paroled until a minimum of fifteen
calendar years have been served.]
589.425. 1. A person commits the crime of failing to
register as a sex offender when the person is required to
register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 and fails to
comply with any requirement of sections 589.400 to 589.425.
Failing to register as a sex offender is a class E felony
unless the person is required to register based on having
committed an offense in chapter 566 which was an

SB 1294 136
unclassified felony, a class A or B felony, or a felony
involving a child under the age of fourteen, in which case
it is a class D felony.
2. A person commits the crime of failing to register
as a sex offender as a second offense by failing to comply
with any requirement of sections 589.400 to 589.425 and he
or she has previously pled guilty to or has previously been
found guilty of failing to register as a sex offender.
Failing to register as a sex offender as a second offense is
a class E felony unless the person is required to register
based on having committed an offense in chapter 566, or an
offense in any other state or foreign country, or under
federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, which if
committed in this state would be an offense under chapter
566 which was an unclassified felony, a class A or B felony,
or a felony involving a child under the age of fourteen, in
which case it is a class D felony.
3. (1) A person commits the crime of failing to
register as a sex offender as a third offense by failing to
meet the requirements of sections 589.400 to 589.425 and he
or she has, on two or more occasions, previously pled guilty
to or has previously been found guilty of failing to
register as a sex offender. Failing to register as a sex
offender as a third offense is a class A felony which shall
be punished by a term of imprisonment of not less than ten
years and not more than thirty years.
(2) No court may suspend the imposition or execution
of sentence of a person who pleads guilty to or is found
guilty of failing to register as a sex offender as a third
offense. No court may sentence such person to pay a fine in
lieu of a term of imprisonment.

SB 1294 137
(3) [A person sentenced under this subsection shall
not be eligible for conditional release or parole until he
or she has served at least two years of imprisonment.
(4)] Upon release, an offender who has committed
failing to register as a sex offender as a third offense
shall be electronically monitored as a mandatory condition
of supervision. Electronic monitoring may be based on a
global positioning system or any other technology which
identifies and records the offender's location at all times.
622.470. Any person who shall willfully make any false
entry in the accounts, books of account, records, or
memoranda kept by any carrier, corporation, or person
governed by the provisions of this chapter, or who shall
willfully destroy, mutilate, alter, or by any other means or
device falsify the record of any such account, book of
accounts, record, or memoranda, or who shall willfully
neglect or fail to make full, true, and correct entries of
such account, book of accounts, record, or memoranda of all
facts and transactions appertaining to the business of such
carriers, corporations, or persons, or who shall falsely
make any statement required to be made to the division, for
which a penalty has not been provided, shall be deemed
guilty of a class E felony[,] and, upon conviction, shall be
punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for a
term not [less] more than [two] four years [nor more than
five years], or by both such fine and imprisonment, except
that the division may, in its discretion, issue orders
specifying such operating, accounting or financial papers,
records, books, blanks, tickets, stubs, or documents, of
carriers which may after a reasonable time be destroyed, and

SB 1294 138
prescribing the length of time such books, papers, or
documents shall be preserved.
643.250. 1. Any authorized representative of the
department may enter at all reasonable times, in or upon
public or private property for purposes required under
sections 643.225 to 643.250. In addition to any other
remedy provided by law, refusal to allow such entry shall be
grounds for revocation of registration or injunctive relief.
2. Any person who knowingly violates sections 643.225
to 643.250, or any rule promulgated thereunder, shall, upon
conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than [twenty-
five] two thousand five hundred dollars nor more than twenty-
five thousand dollars per day of violation, or by
imprisonment for a term not more than one year, or both.
Second and successive convictions of any person shall be
guilty of a class E felony and be punished by a fine of not
more than fifty thousand dollars per day of violation, or by
imprisonment for not more than [two] four years, or both.
3. Any person who violates any provision of sections
643.225 to 643.250 may, in addition to any other penalty
provided by law, incur a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed ten thousand dollars for each day of violation. The
civil penalty shall be in an amount to constitute an actual
and substantial economic deterrent to the violation for
which the civil penalty is assessed.
4. Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any
other remedy provided by sections 643.225 to 643.250, the
commission may maintain, in the manner provided by chapter
536, an action in the name of the state of Missouri for
injunction or other process against any person to restrain
or prevent any violation of the provisions of sections
643.225 to 643.250.

SB 1294 139
644.076. 1. It is unlawful for any person to cause or
permit any discharge of water contaminants from any water
contaminant or point source located in Missouri in violation
of sections 644.006 to 644.141, or any standard, rule, or
regulation promulgated by the commission. In the event the
commission or the director determines that any provision of
sections 644.006 to 644.141 or standard, rules, limitations,
or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, or permits
issued by, or any final abatement order, other order, or
determination made by the commission or the director, or any
filing requirement pursuant to sections 644.006 to 644.141
or any other provision which this state is required to
enforce pursuant to any federal water pollution control act,
is being, was, or is in imminent danger of being violated,
the commission or director may cause to have instituted a
civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction for the
injunctive relief to prevent any such violation or further
violation or for the assessment of a penalty not to exceed
ten thousand dollars per day for each day, or part thereof,
the violation occurred and continues to occur, or both, as
the court deems proper. A civil monetary penalty pursuant
to this section shall not be assessed for a violation where
an administrative penalty was assessed pursuant to section
644.079. The commission, the chair of a watershed
district's board of trustees created under section 249.1150,
or the director may request either the attorney general or a
prosecuting attorney to bring any action authorized in this
section in the name of the people of the state of Missouri.
Suit may be brought in any county where the defendant's
principal place of business is located or where the water
contaminant or point source is located or was located at the
time the violation occurred. Any offer of settlement to

SB 1294 140
resolve a civil penalty pursuant to this section shall be in
writing, shall state that an action for imposition of a
civil penalty may be initiated by the attorney general or a
prosecuting attorney representing the department pursuant to
this section, and shall identify any dollar amount as an
offer of settlement which shall be negotiated in good faith
through conference, conciliation, and persuasion.
2. Any person who knowingly makes any false statement,
representation, or certification in any application, record,
report, plan, or other document filed or required to be
maintained pursuant to sections 644.006 to 644.141 or who
falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any
monitoring device or method required to be maintained
pursuant to sections 644.006 to 644.141 shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a class E felony and punished by a
fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by
imprisonment for not more than [six months] four years, or
by both.
3. Any person who willfully or negligently commits any
violation set forth pursuant to subsection 1 of this section
shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not less
than two thousand five hundred dollars nor more than twenty-
five thousand dollars per day of violation, or by
imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. Second
and successive convictions for violation of the same
provision of this section by any person shall be punished by
a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars per day of
violation, or by imprisonment for not more than two years,
or both.
4. The liabilities which shall be imposed pursuant to
any provision of sections 644.006 to 644.141 upon persons
violating the provisions of sections 644.006 to 644.141 or

SB 1294 141
any standard, rule, limitation, or regulation adopted
pursuant thereto shall not be imposed due to any violation
caused by an act of God, war, strike, riot, or other
catastrophe.
✓